3
CHAPTER I.
FALSE PRIDE AND UNSOPHISTICATED INNOCENCE.
What
are you doing there Lucy? said Mrs.
Cavendish to a lovely girl, about fifteen years old.
She was kneeling at the feet of an old man sitting
just within the door of a small thatched cottage
situated
about five miles from Southampton on the coast
of Hampshire. What are you doing there child?
said she, in rather a sharp tone, repeating her
question
.
Binding up sergeant Blandford's leg ma'am, said
the kind hearted young creature, looking up in the
face of the person who spoke to her. At the same
time, rising on one knee she rested the lame limb
on a stool on which was a soft cushion which this
child of benevolence had provided for the old soldier.
And was there no one but you Miss Blakeney
who could perform such an office? You demean
yourself strangely. I did not think it was any
degradation, replied Lucy, to perform an act of
kindness to a fellow creature, but I have done now,
continued she rising, and will walk home with you
ma'am if you please. She then wished the sergeant
a good night, and tying on her bonnet which had been
thrown on the floor during her employment, she took
Mrs. Cavendish's arm, and they proceeded to the
house of the Rector of the village.
There! Mr. Matthews, exclaimed the lady on
entering the parlour, there! I have brought home
Miss Blakeney, and where do you think I found her?
and how employed?
Where you found her, replied Mr. Matthews,
smiling, I will not pretend to say; for she is a
sad rambler, but I dare be bound that you did not
find her either foolishly or improperly employed.
I found her in old Blandford's cottage, swathing
up his lame leg. And how my good madam,
inquired Mr. Matthews, could innocence be better
employed, than in administering to the comforts of
the defender of his country?
Well, well, you always think her right, but we
shall hear what my sister says to it. Mrs. Matthews,
do you approve of a young lady of rank and fortune
making herself familiar with all the beggars and low
people in the place?
By no means, said the stately Mrs. Matthews,
and I am astonished that Miss Blakeney has not a
higher sense of propriety and her own consequence.
Dear me, ma'm, interrupted Lucy, it was to
make myself of consequence that I did it; for lady
Mary, here at home, says I am nobody, an
insignificant
Miss Mushroom, but sergeant Blandford calls
me his guardian angel, his comforter; and I am sure
those are titles of consequence.
Bless me, said Mrs. Cavendish, what plebeian
ideas the girl has imbibed, it is lucky for you child,
that you were so early removed from those people.
I hope madam, replied Lucy, you do not
mean to say that it was fortunate for me that I was
so early deprived of the protection of my dear
grandfather
?
Alas! it was a heavy day for me; he taught
me that the only way to become of real consequence,
is to be useful to my fellow creatures. Lucy put
her hand before her eyes to hide the tears she could
not restrain, and courtesying respectfully to Mr.
Matthews, his wife and sister, she left the room.
Well, I protest sister, said Mrs. Cavendish,
that is the most extraordinary girl I ever knew;
with a vast number of low ideas and habits, she can
sometimes assume the
hauteur
and air of a dutchess.
In what a respectful yet independent manner she
went out of the room, I must repeat she is a most
extraordinary girl.
Mrs. Matthews was too much irritated to reply
with calmness, she therefore wisely continued silent.
Mr. Matthews was silent from a different cause, and
supper being soon after announced, the whole family
went into the parlour; Lucy had dried her tears, and
with a placid countenance seated herself by her
reverend
friend, Mr. Matthews.
You
, I hope, are not
angry with me, Sir? said she with peculiar emphasis.
No my child, he replied, pressing the hand she
had laid upon his arm, No, I am not angry, but
my little Lucy must remember that she is now
advancing
towards womanhood, and that it is not
always safe, nor perfectly proper, to be rambling
about in the dusk of the evening without a
companion
.
Then if you say so sir, I will never do it again;
but indeed you do not know how happy my visits
make old Mr. Blandford; you know, sir, he is very
poor; so Lady Mary would not go with me if I
asked her; and he is very lame, so if Aura went
with me, she is such a mad-cap, perhaps she might
laugh at him; besides, when I sometimes ask Mrs.
Matthews to let her walk with me, she has something
for her to do, and cannot spare her.
Well, my dear, said the kind hearted old
gentleman
,
when you want to visit him again ask me
to go with you. Oh! you are the best old man
in the world, cried Lucy, as rising she put her arms
round his neck and kissed him. There now, there
is a specimen of low breeding, said Mrs. Cavendish,
you ought to know, Miss Blakeney, that nothing
can be more rude than to call a person old. I
did not mean to offend, said Lucy. No! I am
sure you did not, replied Mr. Matthews, and so
let us eat our supper, for when a man or woman,
sister, is turned of sixty they may be termed old,
without much exaggeration, or the smallest breach
of politeness.
But the reader will perhaps like to be introduced
to the several individuals who compose this family.
3*
CHAPTER II.
THE LITTLE HEIRESS, AND THE MASTER OF THE
MANSION.
Lucy Blakeney
had from her earliest infancy been
under the protection of her maternal grandfather;
her mother had ushered her into life at the expense
of her own, and captain Blakeney of the navy, having
been her godfather, she was baptized by the name of
Blakeney in addition to her own family name. Captain
Blakeney was the intimate friend of her grandfather,
he had loved her mother as his own child, and dying
a bachelor when Lucy was ten years old, he left her
the whole of the property he had acquired during the
war which had given to the United States of America,
rank and consequence among the nations of the earth;
and during which period he had been fortunate in
taking prizes, so that at the time of his death, his
property amounted to more than twenty thousand
pounds sterling. This he bequeathed to his little
favourite on condition that she took the name and
bore the arms of Blakeney; indeed, she had never
been called by any other name, but the will required
that the assumption should be legally authorized, and
a further condition was, that whoever married her,
should change his own family name to that of
Blakeney
,
but on a failure of this, the original sum was to
go to increase the pensions of the widows of officers
of the navy dying in actual service, Lucy only
retaining the interest which might have accumulated
during her minority.
About two years after this rich bequest, Lucy
literally became an orphan by the death of both her
grandparents, within a few months of each other.
She inherited from her grandfather a handsome
patrimony
,
enough to support and educate her in a very
superior style, without infringing on the bequest of
captain Blakeney, the interest of which yearly
accumulating
would make her by the time she was twenty
one, a splendid heiress.
The reverend Mr. Matthews had lived in habits
of intimacy with both the grandfather of Lucy and
captain Blakeney, though considerably younger than
either; he was nominated her guardian in
conjunction
with Sir Robert Ainslie, a banker in London, a
man of strict probity, to whom the management of
her fortune was intrusted.
To Mr. Matthews the care of her person was
consigned
,
he had promised her grandfather that she
should reside constantly in his family, and under his
eye receive instruction in the accomplishments
becoming
the rank she would most probably fill in society,
from the best masters; whilst the cultivation of her
mental powers, the formation of her moral and
religious
character, and the correction of those erring
propensities which are the sad inheritance of all the
sons and daughters of Adam, he solemnly promised
should be his own peculiar care.
Mr. Matthews was, what every minister of the
Gospel should be, the profound scholar, the finished
gentleman, and the sincere, devout christian. Plain
and unaffected in his address to his parishioners, on
the sabbath day, or any day set apart for devotional
exercises, he at all other times exemplified in his
own conduct the piety and pure morality he had from
the pulpit forcibly recommended to others. Liberal
as far as his circumstances would allow, without
ostentation; strictly economical without meanness;
conscientiously pious without bigotry or intolerance;
mild in his temper, meek and gentle in his
demeanour
,
he kept his eye steadily fixed on his divine
master
,
and in perfect humility of spirit endeavoured as
far as human nature permits, to tread in his steps.
Alfred Matthews was the youngest son of a
younger
branch of an honourable but reduced family, he
received his early education at Eton, on the
foundation
,
from whence he removed to Cambridge, where
he finished his studies, and received the honours of
the university; his moral character, steady
deportment
,
and literary abilities had raised him so high in
the esteem of the heads of the college, that he was
recommended as private tutor, and afterwards became
the travelling companion to the young Earl of
Hartford
and his brother, Lord John Milcombe.
Returning
from this tour, he for a considerable time became
stationary as domestic chaplain in the family of the
Earl. This nobleman had two sisters, the children
of his mother by a former marriage, both by several
years his seniors. The elder, Philippa, was of a
serious cast, accomplished, sensible, well informed,
pleasing in her person, and engaging in her manners.
Constantia, the younger of the two, had been
celebrated
for her beauty, she was stately, somewhat
affected, and very dictatorial: they were both highly
tinctured with family pride, thinking the name of
Cavendish, might rank almost with royalty itself;
but withal so strongly attached to each other, that
whatever one resolved to do or say, the other upheld
as unquestionably right.
To both these ladies Mr. Matthews was an
acceptable
companion, and from the society of both
he reaped the most unaffected pleasure. He admired
their talents, and esteemed their virtues; but his
heart felt no warmer sentiment, till from several
concurring
circumstances he could not but perceive, that
the amiable Philippa evinced a tenderer attachment
than her sister. On some subjects she could never
converse with him without hesitation and blushes,
while Constantia was easy and unembarrassed upon
all topics. This discovery awakened his gratitude,
but honour told him that the sister of his patron was
in too elevated a station for him to hope to obtain her
brother's consent to their union, he therefore
requested
permission to retire from the family.
I am sorry to lose you from our family circle
Mr. Matthews, said the Earl, when he mentioned
his desire; but it is natural that you should wish to
have a fire side of your own, and it is probable that
you may also wish for a companion to make that
fire side cheerful, I must beg you to accept the
Rectory
of L which has lately become vacant and
is in my gift, till something better can be offered.
Every thing being arranged for his leaving the
family
,
it was mentioned the next evening at supper.
Philippa felt her colour vary, but she neither looked
up nor spoke; Constantia, turning towards him, with
vivacity, inquired How long he had taken the whim
of keeping bachelor's hall, though I beg your pardon
for the suggestion, said she, perhaps some fair
ladyhere she stopped, for Philippa's agitation was
evident, and Constantia perceived that her brother
noticed it.
When the ladies had retired, the Earl suddenly
addressed his friend, If I am not very much
mistaken
,
Mr. Matthews, one of my sisters would have
no objection to break in upon your bachelor scheme.
Come, be candid, is the inclination mutual? I
hope, my lord, replied Mr. Matthews, that you
do not suspect me of the presumption.I see no
presumption in it my friend, rejoined the Earl;
your family, your education, your talents, set you
upon an equality with any woman, and though
Philippa
is not rich, yet her fortune and your income
from the Rectory will supply the comforts,
conveniences
,
and many of the elegances of life.
The conversation continued till the hour of repose,
when after taking counsel of his pillow. Mr.
Matthews
resolved to solicit the favour of Miss
Cavendish
,
and proved a successful wooera few months
after, he became master of the Rectoryhad a fire
side of his own, and an amiable companion to render
that fire side cheerful.
In the course of twenty years many changes had
taken place: the Earl of Hartford had married a
beautiful, but very dissipated woman, who, though she
brought him but a very small fortune, knew extremely
well how to make use of his, and diffuse its benefits
in a most elegant and fashionable style. Her
profusion
knew no bounds, and, the Earl being taken off by
a rapid fever, his affairs were found in so
embarrassed
a state that his sisters' fortunes, which had never
been paid, though they had regularly received the
interest, were reduced to less than half their original
value, which was twenty thousand pounds. With
this comparatively small portion, Mrs. Matthews
and Mrs. Constantia Cavendish were obliged to be
content.
Mr. Matthews continued Rector of L, but no
change of circumstances could lead him to accept a
plurality of livings. It was a point of conscience
with him to be paid for no more duty than he was
able to perform himself, and as he was not able to
allow a curate a liberal stipend, he employed none.
When Mrs. Constantia argued with him on the
subject
;
as she sometimes would; and wondered that
he would perform all offices of the Rectorship himself,
when he might have a curate who would think
himself
well paid by fifty pounds a year, and who would
take the most troublesome part upon himself. I
should be sorry sister, he would reply to consider
any part of my duty a trouble, and what right have
I to expect another to do for fifty pounds, what I am
paid five hundred for doing? Every clergyman is,
or should be a gentleman, and I think it highly
disgraceful
for one minister of the gospel to be lolling
on velvet cushions, rolling in his carriage, and faring
sumptuously every day, while many, very many of
his poor brethren, labourers in the same vineyard,
bowed with poverty, burthened with large families,
would, like Lazarus, be glad to feed on the crumbs
that fall from the rich man's table.
But Mr. Matthews was an old fashioned person,
and perhaps will not be thought very entertaining,
so I will bring forward the young ladies.
CHAPTER III.
THE THREE ORPHANS.
We
have already announced Lucy Blakeney, and
if what has been said, does not give a competent idea
of her character, we must leave it to time to develope;
as to her person, it was of the middle size, perfectly
well proportioned, and her figure and limbs had that
roundness, which, in the eye of an artist, constitutes
beauty. Her complexion was rather fair than dark,
her eyes open, large, full hazel, her hair light brown,
and her face animated with the glow of health and
the smile of good humour.
Lady Mary Lumly had lost her mother a few years
previous to the commencement of our story. She
was an only child and had been indulged to a degree
of criminality by this doatingly fond but weak mother,
so that she had reached her sixteenth year without
having had one idea impressed upon either head or
heart that could in the least qualify her for rational
society, or indeed for any society, but such as her
fancy had created, from an indiscriminate perusal of
every work of fiction that issued from the press.
Her father died when she was an infant; his estates
which had never been adequate to his expenses,
passed
with the title to a male branch of the family, her
mother retired to her jointure house in Lancashire.
Ill health secluded her from company, and finding
her dear Mary averse from study, she sought in a
governess for her daughter, more an easy companion
for herself, than a conscientious able instructress for
her child. The common elements of education,
reading
,
writing, and English grammar, a little dancing,
a little music, and a trifling knowledge of the French
language constituted the whole of her
accomplishments
;
when at the death of her mother, the
guardian
to whom the care of her little fortune had been
intrusted, entreated Mrs. Matthews to receive her into
her family. There was some relationship in the case,
and Mrs. Cavendish thinking, that with her
romantic
ideas, and uninformed mind, a boarding school,
such as her income could afford, would not be a
proper asylum for her, prevailed on her sister to
accede to the proposal.
When scarcely past the age of childhood or
indeed
infancy, she had been allowed to sit beside her
mother, while the tale of misfortune, of love or folly,
was read aloud by the governess, and being possessed
of a quick apprehension, strong sensibility, and a
fertile imagination, she peopled the world, to which
she was in effect a stranger, with lords and ladies,
distressed beauties, and adoring lovers, to the
absolute
exclusion of every natural character, every
rational idea, and truly moral or christian like
feeling
.
Wealth and titles, which were sure to be heaped
4
on the hero or heroine of the tale at last, she
considered
as the
ultimatum
of all sublunary good. Her
mother had been a woman of high rank, but small
fortune; she had therefore amongst other weak
prejudices
imbided a strong predilection in favour of
ancient nobility, and not to have a particle of noble
blood flowing through one's veins was, in her
opinion
,
to be quite insignificant.
This orphan of quality was as handsome as flaxen
hair, light eyebrows, fair skin, blooming cheeks, and
large glossy blue eyes could make her. The features
of her face were perfectly regular but there was no
expression in them, her smile was the smile of
innocence
,
but it was also the smile of vacancy. She was
tall, her limbs were long and her figure flat and
lean; yet she thought herself a perfect model for a
statuary. Her temper was naturally good, but the
overweening pride and morbid sensibility, which
were the fruits of the imprudent system of her
education
,
rendered her quick to take offence where no
offence was meant, and not unfrequently bathed her
in tears, without any real cause. At the period when
we introduced her to our readers, she was nearly
seventeen years old, and had been under the care of
Mr. Matthews, for the last four years.
Aura Melville completed the trio of fair orphans.
Aura was the only child of a poor clergyman to
whom Mr. Matthews had been, during a long and
painful illness, an undeviating friend; she was ten
years old, when death released her father from a state
of sufferingher mother had been dead several years
previous to this event.
It was an evening towards the end of July, the
pale light of a moon just entered on its second
quarter
shone faintly into the chamber of the feeble invalid,
a chamber to which he had been confined for more
than eight months; the casement was open and the
evening breeze passing through the blooming
jessamine
,
that climbed the thatch of the humble cottage,
wafted its refreshing perfume to cool the hectic cheek
of the almost expiring Melville. He was seated in
an easy chair, Mr. Matthews by his side, and the
little Aura on a cushion at his feet, Look, my own
papa, said she, how beautifully the moon shines;
does not this cool breeze make you feel better? I
love to look at the moon when it is new, continued
she, I do not know why, but it makes me feel so
pleasantly, and yet sometimes I feel as if I could
cry; and I say to myself what a good God our God
is, to give us such a beautiful light to make our nights
pleasant and cheerful, that, without it, are so dark
and gloomy. Oh! my own dear papa, if it would
but please our good God to make you well!
Melville
pressed her hand, Mr. Matthews felt the drop
of sensibility rise to his eye; but neither of them
spoke.
The child, finding both remain silent, continued.
I hope you will be better, a great deal better, before
next new moon. I shall be well, quite well, my
darling, in a very little time, said her father, for
before this moon is at the full, I shall be at rest.
You will rest a good deal before that, I hope, said
she with tender simplicity, then pausing a moment,
she sprang up, and throwing her arms round his
neck, she exclaimed, Ah! I understand you now:
Oh, my own dear papa! what will become of Aura!
Oh, my good God, if it please you to let me die with
my papa! for when he is gone there will be no one to
love or care for his poor Aura. Her sobs impeded
farther utteranceMelville had clasped the
interesting
child in his arms, his head sunk on her shoulder,
her cheek rested on his. Mr. Matthews, fearing this
tender scene would be too much for his debilitated
frame, went towards them and endeavoured to
withdraw
her from his embrace. At the slightest effort,
his arms relaxed their hold, his head was raised from
her shoulder, but instantly falling back against the
chair, Mr. Matthews, shocked to the very soul,
perceived
that Aura was an orphan.
The poor child's anguish, when she discovered the
truth, is not to be described. She shall never want
a protector, said he mentally, as he was leading her
from the house of death to his own mansion.
Philippa, said he, presenting Aura to his wife,
Providence has sent us a daughter; be a mother to
her my dear companion, love her, correct her, teach
her to be like yourself, she will then be most
estimable
.
Mrs. Matthews with all her family pride,
possessed
a kind and feeling heart, that heart loved most
tenderly Alfred Matthews,could she do otherwise
than comply with his request? She took the poor
girl to her bosom, and though she experienced not
the most tender affection, yet Aura Melville found
in her all the care and solicitude of a mother.
Her father had laid a good foundation in her
innocent
mind, and Mr. Matthews carefully completed the
education he had begun, and at the age of nineteen,
the period when first she appears in our pages, she
was a pleasing well informed young woman; highly
polished in her manners, yet without one showy
accomplishment. She knew enough of music to
enjoy and understand its simple beauties, but she
performed on no instrument. She moved gracefully,
and could, if called upon, join a cotillion or contra
dance, without distressing others; her
understanding
was of the highest order, and so well cultivated
that she could converse with sense and propriety on
almost any subject. Yet unobtrusive, modest and
humble, she was silent and retired, unless called forth
by the voice of kindness and encouragement. She
was beloved in the family; industrious, discreet,
cheerful, good humoured, grateful to her benefactors,
and contented with her lot; she won the regard and
without exacting it, gained the respect of all who
knew her.
CHAPTER IV.
ROMANCE, PIETY, SENSIBILITY.
Lucy
, after the gentle reproof she received from
Mr. Matthews, was careful not to go out in the
evening without a companion; she frequently visited
the cottages of the poor class of industrious peasants,
4*
and as her allowance for clothes and pocket money
was liberal and her habits by no means expensive,
she had many opportunities of relieving the
distresses
of some, and adding to the comforts of others.
Sometimes she would tempt Lady Mary to ramble
with her, but that young lady but little understood
the common incidents, and necessities of life, and
even had she comprehended them ever so well, she
was so thoughtless in her expenditure on dress and
trifles, that she seldom had any thing to bestow.
Aura Melville was therefore her usual associate and
adviser in these visits of charity. Her bosom
sympathized
in their sufferings, and her judgment
suggested
the relief likely to be of most benefit.
One evening Lady Mary had been walking with a
young lady in the neighbourhood, whose tastes and
feelings resembled her own, when, just as the family
were preparing to take their tea, she rushed into the
parlour and in a flood of tears exclaimed, Oh, my
dear sir, my kind Mr. Matthews, if you do not help
me I shall lose my senses. How, my dear?
said he, approaching the seat on which she had thrown
herself in an attitude of the utmost distress. Oh,
sir, said she, sobbing, I must have five guineas
directly, for I wanted so many things when you paid
me my last quarter's allowance, that I have not a
guinea left. I am sorry for that, replied Mr.
Matthews, for you know that it will be six weeks
before another payment is due. Oh yes, I know
that: but I thought you would be so good as to lend
it to me on this very, very urgent occasion! And
pray what may the very, very urgent occasion be?
asked he smiling, and placing a chair near the tea
table, he motioned with his hand for her to draw nigh
and partake the social meal, for which the rest of the
family were now waiting.
I cannot eat, indeed I cannot, sir, she replied
with an hysterical sob, I can do nothing till you
comply with my request.
That I certainly shall not do at present, child.
I must understand for what this sum is required, and
how you mean to dispose of it. Five guineas, Lady
Mary, is a considerable sum; it should not be hastily
or unadvisedly lavished away. It might rescue many
suffering individuals from absolute want.
Yes, sir, it is for that I want it, I know you will
let me have it. I am not quite so sure about that.
But come, Mary Lumly, for so the good man was
wont to call her when he was pleased with her,
come, draw nigh and take your tea, after which
you shall tell your story and to-morrow morning
we will see what can be done.
To-morrow! sir, to-morrow! exclaimed she
wildly, to-morrow, it may be too late, they are
suffering the extremity of want, and are you so cold
hearted as to talk of to-morrow?
Miss Blakeney and Aura Melville exchanged
looks with each other. Mr. Matthews sat down and
began his tea. You must permit me to tell you,
Lady Mary Lumly, said Mrs. Cavendish, in her
stately manner, that this is very unbecoming
behaviour
,
you call it no doubt sensibility; but you give
it too dignified a name. It is an affectation of fine
feeling
,
it arises more from a wish to display your own
humanity, than from any genuine sympathy. The
heart has little to do with it. You have spoken
rudely to my brother Matthews; he, worthy man,
knows what true sensibility is, and is actuated by its
dictates, though you, disrespectful girl, have called
him cold hearted.
Resentment at being spoken to, in so plain a style,
soon dried Lady Mary's tears. She seated herself
at the tea table, took her cup, played with her spoon,
poured the tea into the saucer, then back into the
cup; in short, did every thing but drink it.
The tea service removed, Mr. Matthews said,
come hither, Mary Lumly, and now let us hear
your tragical tale. Lady Mary's excessive
enthusiasm
had by this time considerably abated, but she
felt somewhat vexed at the plain, well meant reproof
of Mrs. Cavendish. However, she seated herself on
the sofa beside Mr. Matthews, and in a concilatory
tone began. I am afraid that I have not been so
respectful as I ought to be, sir, but my feelings ran
away with me. Your impetuosity, you should
say, child, interrupted Mrs. Cavendish.Lady Mary
coloured highly. The evening is really very fine,
said the good Rector, come, Mary, you and I will
go and inhale the sweets of the flowers, then
drawing
her arm under his, he led her into the garden.
So you have been taking a ramble with Miss
Brenton this afternoon.
Yes, sir, and we went farther than we intended,
for we went through the little copse, and took a path
which neither of us had any knowledge of, and having
walked a considerable way without seeing any house,
or meeting any one, we began to feel alarmed. I
think you were very imprudent, Mary, you might
have encountered ill bred clowns or evil minded
persons
who would have insulted you.
I know it, sir, but I am very glad I went, for all
that.
How so?
Why, just as we began to feel a little frightened,
we heard a child cry, and following the sound, we
came to a very wretched hovel, for it could not be
called even a cottage. At the door sat a child about
four years old, crying. What is the matter child?
said Miss Brenton. Mammy is sick and Granny
fell out of her chair, and Daddy a'n't come home yet.
We both of us were in the hut in a moment, Oh!
dear sir, I never shall forget it, on the bed as they
called it, but it was only some straw laid upon a kind
of shelf made of boards and covered with a ragged
blanket, so dirty that I was almost afraid to go near
it, andandon this wretched bed lay a poor pale
woman with a little, very little baby on her arm.
Lady Mary's lip quivered, Mr. Matthews pressed
her hand and said, But the poor old Granny? you
have not told me about her.
She had been up all the preceding night with her
daughter, and not having any help all day, or much
nourishment I believe, she had fainted and fell out
of her chair; the little girl whose crying had brought
us to the place, had run out in great alarm; but when
we entered the house, the old woman had recovered,
and was sitting, pale as a ghost and unable to
articulate
,
by the handful of fire, over which hung an iron
pot.
Why this is a most deplorable tale, my dear
Mary.
But I have not told you the worst, sir.
Why I suppose the worst was, you had no money
to give them?
No, I had a crown in my purse, and I gave it
to the old woman, who as she looked at it burst into
tears and recovering her speech, said God forever
bless you.
But had Miss Brenton nothing to give?
Oh no, sir, she said her sensibility was so great
she could not stay in the hovel, and they were so
dirty that she was afraid of contracting some
infectious
disorder.
Then that was the worst, for I suppose she ran
away and left you?
Yes, she did, and said she would wait for me by
the road side, so while I was inquiring what they
most wanted, and the poor sick woman with the baby,
said, every thing, a rough looking man with two
boys and a girl came in; he went to the sick woman,
asked her how she did, and then turning to the old
woman said, Mother, is there any thing for supper?
Yes, thank God, said the mother, I have got
summut
for ye, John, which a kind hearted christian man
gave me this morn. She then opened the pot, took
out a small piece of meat, and two or three turnips,
and said, there, John, is a nice piece of mutton, and
Sally has supped a little of the broth, oh! 'twas a great
comfort to her, and here, dears, taking up some of
the water in which the meat had been boiled, in
porringers
,
here's a nice supper for ye all. She then
gave the children each a piece of bread, so black, that
I ran out of the place ashamed that my curiosity had
kept me there so long, when I had so little to give.
It was not curiosity, Mary, it was a better feeling:
but had you been mistress of five guineas, and had
them in your purse at that moment would you have
given them?
Oh yes, ten, if I could have commanded them,
but now, sir, that you know the whole, you will, I
am sure, lend me the money.
We will see about it to-morrow, your crown will
for the present provide a few necessaries, so rest in
quiet, my good girl, for believe me the bit of boiled
mutton and turnips were heartily relished by the
man; and the water as you call it, the children,
who I suppose had been out at work all day, ate
with a keener appetite than you would have
partaken
of the most delicate viands.
The next morning Lady Mary, who was not an
early riser, and did not generally make her
appearance
till the rest of the family were seated at the
breakfast table, was surprised, upon entering the
parlour
,
to find Miss Blakeney, and Miss Melville had
just returned from a walk in which they had been
accompanied by their guardian, their hair disordered
by the morning breeze and their countenances
glowing
with health and pleasure.
You are an idler, Mary Lumly, said Mr.
Matthews
,
but exercise is so necessary to preserve
health that I am resolved that you shall accompany
me in a round of visits to some of my parishioners
this morning. This was an invitation he frequently
gave to one or the other of the fair orphans under
his protection. The morning was fine, and Lady
Mary hoping he would take the path through the
copse, readily assented, and being soon equipped for
her walk, gaily tripped by his side till she found that
he took a directly opposite path to what she had
expected.
I was in hopes you would have gone with me to
visit the poor people I mentioned, said she in rather
a supplicating voice. All in good time, child, he
replied, I have several poor and some sick persons
to visit. The first cottage they entered, they saw
a pale looking woman at her spinning; near her, two
children seated on a stool, held a spelling book
between
them, and in an old high backed arm chair sat
a man, the very picture of misery; his feet and hands
were wrapped in coarse flannel. Every thing around
them indicated extreme poverty, yet every thing
was perfectly clean: the children's clothes were
coarse, but not ragged, the mother preferring a patch
of a different colour, to a hole or rent.
How are you, neighbour? said Mr. Matthews,
and how are you, my good Dame, and how do you
contrive to keep all so tight and orderly, when you
have a sick husband to attend, and nothing but your
own labour to support him, yourself and your
children
?
Oh, sir, said the woman, rising, we
have much to be thankful for. The good Sir Robert
Ainslie has ordered his steward to let us live in this
cottage, rent free, till my husband shall get better,
and the house keeper lets little Bessey here have a
pitcher of milk and a plate of cold meat every now
and then, so, please your Reverence, we are not so
bad off as we might be.
What is the matter with your husband? asked
Lady Mary, with a look of wonder at the woman's
expression of contentment, when there was so much
apparent wretchedness around her.
Why, your Ladyship, Thomas, though he be an
industrious kind husband, was never over strong; he
worked too hard, and last summer took a bad fever;
and when he was getting better he would go to work
again before he had got up his strength; the season
was very wet and he was out late and early, so, you
see, he got a bad cold, and his fever came on worse
than ever, and the rheumatics set in, and ever since
he has been a cripple like, not being able to use his
hands or feet.
Dear me, that is very terrible, said Lady Mary,
how can you possibly live, how do you get time to
work.
I gets up early, my Lady, and sits up late;
sometimes
I can earn, one way or another, three and
sixpence
a week, and sometimes, but not very often,
five shillings.
Five shillings! repeated the astonished Mary,
can four people live on five shillings a week?
Mr. Matthews had been, during this time, talking
with the invalid, but catching her last words he
replied, Aye, child, and many worthy honest
christians
with larger families are obliged to do with less.
We, I am sure, said Thomas, ought not to
complain, thanks be to God and my good Dame, we
are main comfortable, but I fear me, your
Reverence
,
5
she will kill herself, she washes and mends our
clothes when she ought to be resting, after spinning
all day or going out to work, to help the gentlefolks'
servants to wash and clean house. I sometimes hope
and pray that I may soon recover the use of my
hands and feet, or that it will please my Maker to
lay me at rest.
No! no! heaven forbid, Thomas, I can work
very well, I can be contented with any thing, so you
are spared, and you will get well by and by, and
then we shall all be happy again.
The tears which had for some time trembled in
Lady Mary's eyes, now rushed down her cheeks,
she drew forth her empty purse and looked
beseechingly
at Mr. Matthews. He did not particularly
notice her, but asked, Does the doctor attend you
regularly? Is he kind and considerate.
Oh yes, sir, and we gets all the physic and such
stuff from the Potticary without paying, thanks to
you, reverend sir, then the housekeeper at the great
house sent us some oatmeal and sago, a nutmeg and
a whole bottle of wine, and that has made poor
Thomas comfortable for above a month past. Oh we
have so many blessings.
Mr. Matthews gave the woman an approving
smile, and presenting her with half a crown, said,
This young lady desires me to give you this, it
may enable you to add a little to your comforts.
Good morning, continue this humble contented frame
of mind and rely on your heavenly Father, he will
in his own good time relieve you from your
difficulties
,
or enable you to support them with patience.
My dear sir, said Lady Mary when they had
left the cottage, what a trifle you gave to that
distressed
family.
Mary, replied the Rector, it is not the
bestowing
large sums that constitutes real benevolence, nor
do such donations ultimately benefit the persons on
whom they are bestowed, they rather serve to
paralyze
the hand of industry, while they lead the
individual
to depend on adventitious circumstances for
relief, instead of exerting his own energies to soften
or surmount the difficulties with which he may be
surrounded.
Many other calls were made in the course of the
morning, till at length they stopped at a very small
cottage, and on entering, Mary was struck with the
appearance of an elderly man and woman both
seemingly
past the period of being useful either to
themselves
or others. A few embers were in the grate,
over which hung a teakettle, and on a deal table stood
a pewter teapot, some yellow cups and saucers and
a piece of the same kind of bread, the sight of which
had filled her with such disgust the evening before, a
little dark brown sugar and about a gill of skimmed
milk completed the preparation for their humble
meal.
Why you are early at your tea, or late at your
breakfast, Gammer, said Mr. Matthews as he
entered
.
The old dame laid down the patchwork with
which she had been employing herself, and her
husband
closed the bible in which he was reading.
Bless you, good sir, said he, tea is often all our
sustenance and serves for breakfast, dinner and
supper
,
but we are old, and can take but little exercise, so
a little food suffices; if sometimes we can get a morsel
of bacon or a crumb of cheese to relish our bread, it
is quite a treat, and a herring laid on the coals is a
feast indeed; but it is long since we have known
better times, and we be got used to the change. I
wish indeed sometimes that I had something to
comfort
my poor old dame, but since the death of our
little darlings, what sustains our tottering frames is
of little consequence; we are thankful for what we
have.
Thankful, said Lady Mary internally,
thankful
for such a poor shed to keep them from the
weather, such a miserable looking bed to rest their
old limbs upon, and some black tea and dry bread
for their only meal.
Mr. Matthews saw that she was struck, and
willing
to give her time for rumination sat down beside
the old man on a stool. The only vacant wooden
chair being dusted by the dame, Lady Mary seated
herself and pursuing her train of thought, audibly
said. I should think, poor woman, you had cause
for repining and discontent rather than
thankfulness
.
Ah no, lady, she replied, what right have I
to expect more than others; how many thousands in
this kingdom have not even a hovel to shelter them,
scarcely a rag to cover them, and only the bare
ground to sleep on, whilst their poor children beg
their daily bread from door to door.
Dreadful! said Lady Mary, and her cheek
assumed a marble hue.
But that is not the worst, continued the woman,
many of these poor souls are as ignorant as the
blackamoors of Africa, they cannot read their Bibles;
they do not know that idleness is next to thieving;
they do not know the God who made them, or the
Saviour who redeemed them. How much happier
are we! This is a poor place to be sure, but it is our
own, and if our bed is hard, we can lie down with
quiet consciences; if we have but little food we
eat it with thankfulness; and when we are low
spirited
,
our frames feeble and our hearts oppressed, we
can read the word of consolation in God's own book.
Oh lady, these are great blessings.
But I understood from what your husband said,
that you had seen better days; how can you bring
your mind to bear the ills of age and poverty without
complaint.
It is because I know that He who has allotted
my portion knows what is best for me. It is because
I am fully sensible that his bounties are far beyond
my deserts.
What? such poor fare! such a hut! and you a
good well conducted woman, and these wretched
accommodations more than you deserve?
Yes, Lady, had the best of us no more than we
deserve, our portion would be hard indeed. You
say I have seen better days, so I have. But I weary
you, and I beg your pardon, too, Reverend Sir.
You have it, dame, go on, tell your story to
that young lady, I have much to say to your good
man.
5*
Thus encouraged, Gammer Lonsdale again
addressed
her attentive auditor. When I married my
good man there, I had three hundred pounds, which
had been left me by my grandfather, and my
husband
had scraped together about as much more. So
we stocked a farm, and for years went on quite well;
we never had but one child, it was a girl, and, God
forgive us! we were very proud of her, for Alice
Lonsdale grew up a very pretty young woman. I
taught her to be domestic, and to use her needle, but
alack-a-day, I did not teach her to know herself.
There was our first great fault, and when people
praised her beauty or her singing, (for Alice sung
sweetly, Lady,) we used to join in the praise, and
her father, poor man, would chuck her under the
chin, and say aye! aye! in good time we shall see
our girl either a 'squire's or a parson's lady. So
Alice grew vain and conceited, and in an evil hour
we consented that she should pay a visit to a
neighbouring
market town, and attend a dancing school,
for as we had settled it in our weak heads that she
was to be a lady, it was but right that she should
learn to dance.
Alice was now turned of fifteen, and during the
time of her visit to Dorking, (for at that period we
lived in Surry,) she became acquainted with a young
man, the son of a reputable tradesman in that town.
After her return, he sometimes called to see her, and,
to make short of my story, when she was eighteen,
with the consent of both his parents and her own,
Alice became his wife. We gave her five hundred
pounds, his father gave him seven hundred, which
furnished a small house neatly in Croyden, where he
had some family connections, and stocked a shop in
the grocery line.
For some time things went on smoothly; and when
her father and I visited them about a year after their
marriage, we thought they were getting before-hand.
He appeared to be industrious and attentive, and
Alice was cheerful and happy. I staid with my poor
girl during her first confinement, and was very proud
of the little grandson with which she presented me.
After this I saw her no more for two years, but I
used to fancy that her letters were not so sprightly
as formerly. However, I knew that when a woman
becomes a wife and mother, the vivacity of girlhood
is sobered. However some reports having reached
us that her husband was become unsteady, and that it
was thought he was much involved in debt, my good
man took a journey to inquire about it. He found
things worse than had been represented. Alice was
pale, dejected and miserable; her husband had got
acquainted with a set of worthless beings who called
themselves honest fellows; frequented clubs, and
acted private plays, which being done once in the
hall of a public house and money taken for admission,
they were all taken up and had to pay a heavy fine.
My husband had not been many days in Croyden,
before he had reason to think, that Alice was injured
in the tenderest point, and that with her own
domestic
;
but she made no complaint, and while her
father was considering what he should do that might
best promote her happiness, Lewis, for that was her
husband's name, was arrested for fifteen hundred
pounds, on his note which he had given for stock,
and as we afterwards learnt, sold at under price to
supply his extravagance. Alice pleaded with her
father to assist him, her situation was delicate, and
old Mr. Lewis being sent for, his affairs were
compromised
,
the two fathers being bound for him.
My good man then returned home, where he had
not been more than a month, when one evening just
at dusk, a chaise stopped at the gate, and in a few
moments, Alice, leading her little boy, ran up the
walk, and throwing herself into my arms with an
hysterical sob fainted. It was long before she could
articulate. At length she told us old Mr. Lewis
was dead, his property was not sufficient to pay his
debts, that her heartless husband had taken what
valuables
he could collect, and raised money upon every
thing that was not already mortgaged, and absconded
with the abandoned woman I told you about. He
had told Alice that he was going to Dorking to look
into his late father's affairs. Ah, lady, he had been
there before, and gleaned all he could from the
wreck, even to the leaving his old widowed mother
destitute. The same night the woman who lived
with Alice, having asked leave to go out, never
returned, and upon examination it was found that
she had taken her clothes, to which she had added
some of the most valuable belonging to her mistress.
The next day the furniture of the house was taken
by a man who said he had advanced money upon it,
and my poor girl was literally turned into the street.
In this distress the landlord of a large inn had
compassion
on her. He advanced her a few guineas and
sent her in his own chaise to her father, her best and
only friend.
I found upon inquiry that my child had not been
altogether faultless, she had been thoughtless in her
expenses, and never having been controlled in her
youth, she could not practice the necessary patience
and forbearance which her situation required; so
that instead of weaning her unhappy partner from
his pursuits, she perhaps irritated his temper and
made him more dissipated. A few days after her
return, my husband was arrested upon the note, and
being unable to pay so large a sum, his stock upon
the farm was seized, and not being able to meet his
rent, which from various circumstances had run for
six months, we were obliged to quit the farm and take
a cottage a little way from Croyden. Here Alice
gave birth to a daughter and a few days after was
laid at rest in the grave. But our misfortunes were
not ended. Though by working hard and living
poor, we kept free from debt, yet it was a struggle
to maintain the two children.
But we managed to keep them clean and tidy, so
that they went to school, and lovely babies they were,
and my vain proud heart made them my idols, but it
was God's will that I should be humbled to the very
dust. One night the thatch of our cottage caught fire
and we awoke almost suffocated with smoke. We
sprang up; I caught up the girl and ran out, but
before
my husband could escape with the boy, a rafter
fell, and I thought I had lost them both, but with
great atruggling he got out, though greatly bruised
and burnt. The child was so hurt that he was a
caipple as long as he lived.
We were now houseless, pennyless and naked;
neither of us very young, my health not good, and my
husband likely to be confined months before he could
go to work, if indeed he should be ever able to work
again. A cottager who lived about a mile from us,
who had got up early to carry something to Croyden
market, saw the fire, and calling his son, they ran to
our assistance, but nothing was saved. He took my
husband on his back; the lad took the boy; both
father and son had pulled off their outer jackets to
wrap them round me and my little girl; and we
proceeded
as well as we could to neighbour
Woodstock's
cottage.
They did all they could for us, but they were
poor themselves. However, on applying to the
'squire, of whom we had rented the hut, we had lived
in, he bade his housekeeper send us some old clothes.
She not only obeyed him in that, but brought
us some little comforts, and with her came a sweet
boy about the age of little Alice. When this dear
child went back, he told his father, who was then
visiting the 'squire, how poor and how sick we were,
and the next day brought him to see us.
Sir Robert Ainslie, for it was he himself, spoke
to us kindly, gave us money to purchase some
clothing, and procured a doctor to visit my husband
and grandson; he also spoke to the minister about us,
and he came to console and pray with us. Oh, lady,
that was the greatest charity of all; for we did not
know where to look for consolation till he taught us.
We had never considered that a good and all wise
Father has a right to chastise his children when and
how he pleases; we had been full of complaining and
discontent before. But he read to us and prayed
with us, and at length convinced us that it was
possible
to be happy though poor.
When my husband got able to move about, the
dear boy, Master Ainslie, came with his father, one
day, and laying a folded paper on my lap said, Papa
gives you that. So I opened it and found it was a
gift of this place we now live in, and a promise of
five guineas a year as long as I lived.
I could not speak to thank him. He told me that
he had lately purchased an estate in Hampshire; that
he had been to look at it and have it put in repair,
just before he came into Surry; that he recollected
this cottage, and had written to his steward to have
it got ready for us, and that he would have us sent
to it free of all expense.
Well, in a short time we moved here and were
happier than we had ever been in our lives before, for
Sir Robert wrote about us to our good Rector here,
who has comforted and strengthened our minds.
Our dear Alice grew apace; she earned a little
towards clothing herself, and then she was so dutiful
to her grandfather and me, and so kind to her
crippled
brother! But seven years agone last Lammas,
the small pox came into the neighbourhood. The boy
took it first. Nothing could separate his siter from
him, and in one short week I followed both my
darlings to the grave.
The old woman stopped a moment, put her hand
to her forehead, then looking up meekly, cried in
an under tone, Thy will be done! It will not be
long before I go to them, but they can never return
to me. It was the hand of mercy that took them,
for what had they to make life desirable. The boy's
inheritance was decrepitude and poverty, and poor
Alice had all her mother's beauty, and who knows
what snares might have been laid, what temptations
might have assailed her. She might have been lost
both soul and body. Now, thanks be to God! she
is safe in the house of her heavenly Father.
Come, child, it is time for us to be walking,
exclaimed Mr. Matthews, so taking leave of the old
people, he led her out of the cottage. Perceiving
her cheeks wet with tears which she was
endeavouring
to conceal, These are good tears, said he,
indulge them freely, they flow from pity and
admiration
.
From pity, indeed, she replied, but I cannot
admire what I do not rightly understand. Then
pausing a moment, she continued, Pray, sir, are
not these people methodists?
What do you mean by a methodist?
I hardly know how to explain myself, but I
know I have often heard my mamma and governess
laugh about some folks that lived in our
neighbourhood
,
who used to talk a great deal about religion,
and pray and sing psalms, even when they were in
trouble, and they called them methodists!
Is it then, said Mr. Matthews gravely, a
ridiculous thing to say our prayers, or praise the
name of Him from whom all our blessings proceed?
No, sir, but when he has taken from us those
we love, it is difficult to feel perfectly resigned. I
am sure I could not praise him when my mamma
died.
But you could pray to him, I hope?
No, indeed I could not, I thought him very
cruel.
Poor child, said he tenderly, what a barren
waste thy mind was at that time.
But you have made me better, Sir.
I hope God will make you wiser, my love! And
now, Mary, let me advise you, never to use the term
methodist in this way again. Dame Lonsdale and
her husband are good pious members of the church
of England; they are what every christian should
be, humble, devout, and grateful, but let the mode in
which they worship, be what it may, if they are
sincere, they will be accepted: there are many
roads to the foot of the cross, and whichever may be
taken, if it is pursued with a pure and upright heart,
is safe, and He who suffered on it, will remove every
burthen from us whether it be earthly affliction, or
sorrow
for committed offences. While Mr. Matthews
was speaking, a sudden turn in the road made Lady
Mary start, for she beheld just before her, the
identical
cottage to which she had been so desirous to
come when they first began their ramble.
6
CHAPTER V.
A LESSONCHANGE OF SCENE.
As
I live, sir, said she in delight, there is
the place I wanted to visit.
Then we will go in and see how the poor people
are, said Mr. Matthews.
They entered, but how changed was the scene, a
clean though coarsely furnished bed stood in one
corner of the room; the old wooden frame had been
removed; the room was neatly swept and sanded, a
new sauce pan was by the fire, in which gruel was
boiling, the sick woman and her infant were in clean
clothes befitting their station, and the old mother also
appeared in better habiliments, whilst a healthy
looking young woman was busied about some
domestic
concerns.
Every thing wore such a look of comfort, that
Lady Mary thought she had mistaken the place.
But the old woman recognized her, and rising, began
to say how lucky her good ladyship's visit had been
to them all, for that morning two beautiful young
ladies came to see them.
Mayhap, continued she, they be your sisters,
though they were so good natured and
condescending
,
they seemed more like angels than aught else;
and it was not more than two hours after they went
away before a man came to the door with a cart, and
what should be in it, think ye, but that nice bedstead
and bed, with blankets, and sheets, and coverlet, and
some clothes for Sally and her baby; and he brought
that good young body to tend she, till she be up
again; dear heart! how John will be surprised when
he comes home, he won't know his place, not he, but
will think the fairies have been here.
Ah! said Lady Mary, looking at Mr.
Matthews
,
I fancy I know who the fairies were.
The Rector put his finger on his lip, and telling
the women that he was glad to find they were so
well provided for, he led his ward from the cottage.
Now, Mary, said he smiling, how much do
you think those fairies whom you so shrewdly guess
at, expended for all the comforts and conveniences,
these poor people seem to have acquired, since last
evening.
Oh! a great deal, said she, more than five
guineas, I dare say. First there is a bed
That is not a bed, but a second hand mattrass,
which, though a good one, cost little or nothing.
The blankets and coverlet, came from my house, and
are with the bed linen
lent
only. If we find the
woman on her recovery, industrious, clean, and well
behaved, they will be given to her. The rest was
very trifling, a little tea, oatmeal, sugar, and materials
for brown bread, half a cheese, half a side of bacon,
some coals and candles, were all purchased for less
than a guinea and a half. Had you given the sum you
intended, they would have squandered it away, and
not made themselves half so comfortable. I make a
point of inquiring the characters of any poor, who are
my parishioners, before I give them any relief, and
this morning while Lucy and Aura were visiting your
protgs, I investigated their character. The man
is an honest hard working fellow, his wife, I find
from good authority, is idle, and by no means cleanly
in her habits. You, child, have no idea how much the
prosperity and comfort of a poor man, and often of a
rich man too, depends on the conduct of his wife.
The old woman is his wife's mother, she is old and
feeble, can do but little, and often, by a querulous
temper, makes things worse than they would
otherwise
be. You say the children were ragged and
dirty; I shall see that they are comfortably clothed,
and, if I find that the clothes are kept whole and
clean, I will befriend the family farther, but if they
are let run to rags, without washing or mending, I
shall do no more.
Thus, in walking, chatting, making various calls,
and commenting on the scenes they witnessed, time
passed unobserved by Lady Mary. At length Mr.
Matthews, drawing out his watch, exclaimed, I
protest, it is almost four o'clock.
Indeed! said Mary, I am afraid we shall
have dinner waiting. The Rector's hour of dining
was half past three.
I do not think they will wait, he replied, I
have frequently requested they would not wait for
me, for you know I am frequently detained by a
sick bed, or an unhappy person whose mind is
depressed
.
They had now a mile to walk, and Lady Mary
assured the Rector that she was very, very
hungry
!
Arriving at home they discovered that the
family had dined, and the ladies gone out on some
particular purpose. A cloth had been therefore laid
in the study for the ramblers.
Come, said Mr. Matthews, sit down, Mary,
you say you are hungry, we will waive ceremony on
this occasion, and you shall dine in your morning
dress. What have we here? he continued raising a
cover, and discovering part of a boiled leg of mutton,
which had been kept perfectly hot, and on a dish
beside it stood a few turnips not mashed.
Are there no capers, John?
No sir, the cook did not recollect that they were
out till it was too late to get any, and my mistress
said she was sure you would excuse it.
Well, well, we must do as well as we can, said
he, laying a slice of mutton and one of the turnips,
on Lady Mary's plate.
She did not wait for other sauce than a keen
appetite
,
but having dispatched two or three slices of the
meat, with a good quantity of the vegetable and
bread, declared she never had relished a dinner so
well in her life.
You will have a bit of tart? said the Rector,
I warrant John can find one, or a bit of cheese and
biscuit.
Oh no! my dear sir, I have eaten so heartily.
Poor dear young woman! said Mr. Matthews,
in an affected tone of sensibility, how my heart
aches for you, out all the morning, walking from
cottage to cottage, coming home hungry and weary,
and had nothing to eat but a bit of boiled mutton
and turnips, and to wash it down, a glass of cold
water. Here Mr. Matthews pretended to sob;
6*
when Lady Mary comprehending the ridicule, burst
out a laughing.
You see, my child, said he, assuming his own
kind and gracious manner, how misplaced
sensibility
is, when it fancies any thing more than
wholesome
fare, however plain or coarse it may be, is
necessary to satisfy the appetite of those whom
exercise
or labour have rendered really hungry. Where
indeed there is a scanty quantity, it should awaken
our good feelings, and lead us to extend the hand of
charity.
Dear Sir, said Lady Mary, you have this day
taught me a lesson that I trust through life I shall
never forget.
Month after month, and year after year, passed on
while Mr. Matthews was endeavouring to cultivate
the understandings, fortify the principles, and, by air
and exercise, invigorate the frames of his fair wards.
During the six pleasantest months, masters in music
and drawing, from Southampton, attended Lady
Mary and Miss Blakeney, and the other six, they
employed themselves in imparting what they had
gained to Aura Melville, in her leisure hours.
Thus they were improved in a far greater degree,
by the attention necessary to bestow on every
acquirement
in which they were desirous to instruct her.
There were many genteel families in the
neighbourhood
,
but none visited on a more intimate footing,
than that of Sir Robert Ainslie. His son Edward,
had become a great favourite at the Rectory, ever
since they had known the story of old Dame
Lonsdale
and the cottage; but as he was pursuing his
studies at Oxford, they saw him but seldom.
It was in the summer of 1794, when Lucy had
just entered her twentieth year, that Mrs. Cavendish
proposed that, to change the scene, and give the
young people a glimpse of the fashionable world, a
few weeks should be spent in Brighton, and that, the
ensuing winter, they should go to London. Mr. and
Mrs. Matthews were fondly attached to the place
where they had passed so many happy years, yet,
sensible that Lucy in particular, should be introduced
properly into a world where she would most likely
be called upon to act a prominent part, they
consented
,
and about the latter part of June, they
commenced
their journey.
Sir Robert Ainslie and his son were to meet them
there, for Edward was to be their escort to public
places, when Mr. Matthews felt disinclined to mix
in the gay scenes of fashionable life, their attendant
in walks upon the Stiene, or excursions in the
beautiful
environs of Brighton.
This was very pleasant to the whole party. The
elderly ladies were fond of the society of Sir Robert.
Mr. Matthews regarded him as an old and esteemed
friend, and the young ones as a kind of parent, and
his son as their brother. Lady Mary, indeed, could
have fancied herself in love with Edward, and often
in the most pathetic terms lamented to her young
companions that he was not
nobly born
, he was so
handsome, so generous, so gallant.
Yes, said Aura, with an arch glance from under
her long eyelashes, so generally gallant that no one
can have the vanity to suppose herself a particular
favourite.
No, indeed that is true, and I should lament to find
myself
particularized by him, as you know my poor
mother used to say, she should not rest in her grave
if she thought I should ever match myself with any
one below the rank of nobility.
I think, said Aura, laughing, you need be
under no apprehension, unless indeed it should be
from the fear that should he offer, you might not be
able to keep your resolution.
They were soon settled in their new abode at
Brighton, their names enrolled on the books at the
rooms, libraries, &c. and the unaffected manners of
the three fair orphans, their simple style of dress,
unobtrusive beauty, and the general report that they
were all three heiresses, drew numerous admirers
and pretenders, around them. But the grave and
gentlemanly manners of Mr. Matthews, the stately
hauteur of Mrs. Cavendish, with the brotherly
attention
of Edward Ainslie, kept impertinence and
intrusion
at an awful distance.
Edward felt kindly to all, but his heart gave the
preference to Lucy, though he feared to give way to
its natural impulse, lest the world, nay, even the
object of his tenderness, should think him interested.
Sir Robert Ainslie had two sons and a daughter by
a former marriage; these were married and settled,
and were too much the seniors of the present young
party to ever have been in habits of intimacy with
them. The mother of Edward had survived his
birth but a few years; and he became the
consoler
,
delight, and darling of his father. The youth
was endowed with fine talents, a mind of the strictest
rectitude, and perhaps a remark that his cool,
calculating
,
eldest brother once made, that it would be a
fine
spec
for Ned, if he could catch the handsome
heiress, led him to put a curb on that sensibility and
admiration, which might otherwise have led him
to appear as her professed lover.
One fine morning, as they were strolling on the
Stiene, an elegant youth, in military uniform, accosted
him with Ainslie, my dear lad, how are you, this
is a lucky encounter for me, for I hope you spend
some time here, my regiment is here on duty for six
months. Edward received his proffered hand with
great cordiality, and presenting him to the ladies as
Lieutenant Frranklin, of the  regiment, named
to his friend, each of the fair trio, and he joining the
party, they sauntered on the sands an hour longer,
waited on the ladies to Mr. Matthews' door, and then
both gentlemen bade them good morning.
Why, you are in luck's way, Ned, said the
officer
,
to be on such easy terms with the Graces, for
really I must say your three beauties are worthy that
appellation. Are you in any way related to either of
them?
By no means, he replied, my father is
guardian
to one, who is a splendid heiress, and in habits
of great intimacy with the reverend Mr. Matthews,
who is guardian to the other two.
Heiresses also, eh! Ned?
Not exactly so, one has a genteel independence,
the other, poor girl, is an orphan, whose family is
only known to her guardian, and whose fortune, if
report says true, depends entirely on his kindness.
But which is the heiress?
That I shall leave to your sagacity to discover;
but I hope you do not mean to set out in life, with
interested views in the choice of a partner?
Oh no, my good grandfather took care I should
have no occasion to do that, he left me enough for
comfort, and even elegance, with prudent
management
,
and as I have no propensities for gaming,
racing, or other fashionable follies, I shall look out
for good nature, good sense, and discretion in a wife,
in preference to wealth. To be sure, a little beauty,
and a handsome address, would, though not
indispensable
,
be very acceptable qualities.
Lieutenant Franklin was the eldest of four sons,
his father was an officer of artillery, had seen some
hard service, passed a number of years abroad, and
during that period had accumulated a large fortune.
He had married the only daughter of a wealthy man,
resident in the part of the world where he was
stationed
;
was intrusted by government with providing
military stores, &c. during a seven years' war, for a
large army in actual service, and when the war was
ended, returned to his own country; which he had
left nine years before, a Captain of Artillery, with
little besides his pay, an honourable descent, and fair
character, to receive the thanks of royalty for his
intrepidity, and to dash into the world of splendour
and gaiety. His house was one of the most elegant in
Portland place, his equipage and establishment, such
as might have become a nobleman of the first rank.
Bellevue, a large estate near Feversham in Kent,
consisting
of a large handsome and commodious mansion,
several well tenanted farms, pleasure grounds, fish
ponds, green and hot houses, was purchased for his
summer residence.
Promoted to the rank of Colonel of artillery, and
having held the office of chief engineer during his
service abroad, the father of Lieutenant Franklin
stood in an elevated rank, and associated with the
first personages in the kingdom. His eldest son, as
has been mentioned, was amply provided for, and
had chosen the army for his profession. The others,
as yet little more than boys, were finishing their
education at some of the best establishments near
London. His two daughters, Julia and Harriet, were
attended by masters at home, under the
superintendence
of an excellent governess.
From the moment of his introduction to the
family
of Mr. Matthews, Sir Robert Ainslie having
spoken
of him in high terms, Mr. Franklin became a
frequent and always a welcome guest. Though Miss
Blakeney was known to have an independent fortune,
its extent was not confided even to herself; for Mr.
Matthews knew that wealth attracts flattery and good
as he believed Lucy's heart to be, he feared for the
frailty of human nature, if exposed to the breath of
that worst of mental poisons, injudicious and
indiscriminate
adulation.
A cursory observer would never have taken Lucy
for the independent heiress, the retired modesty of
her manners, the respectful deference which she paid
her guardian and his family, united to an intuitive
politeness and real affection with which she ever
distinguished
Aura Melville, would have led any one
to think she was the dependent.
Lady Mary was afraid of Aura, her wit, though
in general harmlessly playful, was sometimes
sarcastic
,
and the vain girl of quality often smarted under
its lash, and if she met the steady eye of Aura, at a
time when she was displaying airs of self
complacency
,
her own would sink under it. The seniors of
the family encouraged this involuntary respect paid
to their protge, and hy their own manner towards
her gave their visitors reason to think, that they
were receiving, rather than conferring a favour, by
her residence among them.
Thus every circumstance coincided to establish the
general idea entertained that Aura was the
independent
heiress, Lady Mary, a young person of rank,
with only a moderate fortune, and Lucy Blakeney,
the orphan, depending on the kindness of Mr.
Matthews
.
Another circumstance contributed to the
mistake
.
Miss Blakeney, though her guardian allowed
her a very handsome stipend for clothes and pocket
money, was yet extremely simple in her attire,
her apparel was ever of the best quality, but it was
unostentatious, no display of splendour, no glitter or
finery disfigured her interesting person; and she
scarcely ever purchased a handsome article of dress
for public occasions, without presenting something
of the same kind, perhaps more elegant or of a finer
texture than her own, to her friend Miss Melville,
yet she contrived to do this without its being
observed
,
for in all their little shopping parties, Aura was
uniformly pursebearer, as Lucy used laughingly to
say, to save herself trouble, but in reality to hide her
own liberality.
Franklin then easily fell into the common error;
and charmed with the person and manners of Miss
Blakeney, feeling how proud and happy he should
feel to raise so lovely a young woman from dependence
to a state of comparative affluence, he determined to
scrutinize her conduct, mark her disposition, and
should all agree with the captivating external, to offer
her his hand, and devote his life to her happiness.
Lucy Blakeney, had she been really a destitute
orphan
,
would, when she perceived Franklin's
attentions
to be serious, and supposed that he imagined
her to be an heiress, have insisted on Mr. Matthews'
explaining her real situation; but when the reverse
was the case, what woman but would have felt highly
flattered by the attentions of one of the handsomest
officers of the corps to which he belonged, a man of
honour, and perfect rectitude of conduct, high in the
esteem of personages of the first rank, and known to
be in possession of a handsome fortune, who thus
avowedly loved her for herself alone?
Mr. Matthews had a little spice of romance in his
composition, and although he did not withdraw the
veil from Miss Blakeney's situation, he would have
shrunk with horror from the idea of obtaining a
splendid alliance for Aura upon the false supposition
of her being an heiress.
But there was no immediate call on the integrity
of the conscientious guardian on this account.
Though numerous were the moths and summer flies
7
who, in expectation of a rich remuneration flitted
round Aura Melville, she kept them at such a
distance
,
that they neither disturbed her peace or
annoyed her in any way. They were all treated
alike, sometimes listened to with perfect
nonchalance
,
sometimes laughed at, and often mortified with
an hauteur which bordered on contempt.
CHAPTER VI.
A RENCONTREA BALLLOVE AT FIRST SIGHT.
It was on one of those mornings when the visitants
of Brighton sally forth to ransack libraries, torment
shopkeepers, and lounge upon the Stiene, when
Edward
Ainslie taking Lucy under one arm and Lady
Mary under the other, having taken a walk upon the
downs, strolled into one of the public Libraries,
where raffles, scandal and flirtation were going
forward
amongst an heterogeneous crowd, assembled
there.
At the upper end of the room sat an elderly
gentleman
in a military undress, apparently in very ill
health; beside him stood an elegant fashionable
woman, evidently past the meridian of life, but still
bearing on her conntenance traces of beauty and
strong intellectual endowments. Ainslie and his
party had been conducted by the master of the shop
to seats near these persons.
I wonder where Mr. Franklin is? said Lady
Mary, as she seated herself, he has neglected us
all last evening and this morning, and I shall scold
him well when I see him again.
I have no doubt, said Lucy, but Mr. Franklin
can give a very good account.
Heavens! exclaimed the lady who stood by
the military invalid. What is the matter, my dear?
Oh! pray make way, let him have air, he is very
weak.
Lucy looked round, the veteran had sunk upon the
shoulder of his wife, pale and almost lifeless.
Having
some
eau de Luce
in her hand which she had
just before purchased, Lucy stepped forward and
presented it to the languid sufferer. The volatile
revived him, he opened his eyes, and gazing wildly
on Lucy, pushed her hand away exclaiming,
Take her away, this vision haunts me forever,
sleeping or waking, it is still before me.
At that moment Lieutenant Franklin broke through
the crowd, that filled the room, and giving Ainslie
and the ladies a slight bow of recognition, helped the
poor invalid to rise, and assisted by the lady, led him
to a carriage which waited at the door of the shop,
the footman helped him in, and Franklin handing in
the lady sprang in after them, and it drove off.
Who is he? What is the matter? was the
general inquiry. Ainslie's party merely heard that
it was a brave veteran, who had served many years
abroad, and received a wound, from the effects of
which he still continued to suffer, and that he
sometimes
laboured under slight fits of insanity. Lucy's
eyes filled. She thought of old Serjeant Blandford.
But what is his disabled limb, said she mentally,
compared to the sufferings of this brave officer?
Blandford has but a poor cottage and the pay of an
invalid, 'tis true, but he is cheerful and even happy.
This poor gentleman appears to be surrounded with
affluence, but is yet miserable.
Ainslie sighed as he led them from the library,
but made no remark. While Lady Mary said,
Dear! what a pity that a man who has so
beautiful
an equipage, should be so sick and unhappy.
Only think how elegant his liveries were, and how
richly the arms were emblazoned on the pannels of
the carriage. Lady Mary had become skilful in
the language of heraldry, under the tuition of her
mother, who doated on rank, pedigree, &c. and
could have held forth for hours on the crests,
supporters
,
mottoes, and heraldic bearings of most of
the noble families in England.
Who was that young lady who offered your
father the
eau de Luce
, and to whom you bowed
this morning, Jack, asked the mother of Franklin,
as he sat tete a tete with her after a melancholy
dinner on the evening of the day in which the events
just related took place.
A Miss Blakeney, a very amiable girl under
the protection of the Rev. Mr. Matthews, who with
his wife, and her sister, the Honourable Mrs.
Cavendish
,
and two young ladies to whom he is guardian,
are passing a few weeks in Brighton. They are a
charming family. I wish my father's health would
permit my bringing you acquainted with them.
It is impossible, said his mother, sighing, for
besides that the health of your dear father is in a
very precarious state, I fear that he has something
heavy at his heart; he is much altered, Jack, within
the last few months; his rest is disturbed, and
indeed
it is only by powerful opiates that he obtains
any, and by them alone the smallest exhiliration of
spirits.
His wound is no doubt very painful, my dear
madam, replied the son, but we will hope that
change of scene, and strict attention to the advice of
the medical gentlemen who attend him, will in time
restore him.
At that moment the Colonel's bell summoned his
servant, and the mother of Franklin flew to the
apartment of her husband, to strive to alleviate his
sufferings by her tenderness and cheer him by her
conversation.
Where was I, Julia, said the Colonel, when
that faintness seized me?
At the Library near the Stiene, my dear. Do
you not recollect the interesting girl who presented
her smelling bottle?
The Colonel put his hand to his head, spoke a few
words in an under voice, and leaning back on a sofa
on which he was seated, closed his eyes, and his
wife continuing silent he dropped into a perturbed
slumber.
We will return to London, said he on
awaking
;
we will set off to-morrow, and then make
an excursion to Margate and Ramsgate; from thence
to Bellevue, where we will finish the summer.
7*
Why not go to your sister's for a few weeks?
she will be much disappointed if we do not make
her a visit this season.
What, to Hampshire? no! no! I cannot go to
Hampshire.
The next morning, Mr. Franklin having
breakfasted
with and taken leave of his parents, they set off
from Brighton, where they had been but three days,
in the vain hope that another place would contribute
to restore the health and spirits of the Colonel.
As the delicacy of every member of Mr.
Matthew's
family forbade the smallest recurrence to the
rencontre in the library with the invalid officer
who, they had learnt, was the father of Lieutenant
Franklin, when two days after he mentioned the
departure of his parents from Brighton, no remark
was made, but the kind wish offered that his health
might soon be restored.
The officers upon duty at Brighton having
received
many civilities from numerous families of
distinction, temporary residents there, determined,
as it drew near the close of the season, to give a
splendid ball. Mr. Matthews' family were among
the invited guests. Lady Mary was wild with
delight
,
even Lucy felt somewhat exhilirated at the
idea of a ball where all the splendor and fashion of
the place would assemble, and where it was expected
some personages of exalted rank would make their
appearance.
Aura Melville was the most stoical of the trio,
though it must be confessed her heart did palpitate
a little quicker than usual, when Edward Ainslie
requested to be her partner the two first dances.
Perhaps those quickened pulsations will in some
measure account for the perfect indifference with
which she had listened to all her admirers.
Balls in anticipation, and indeed in reality are
very pleasant to those engaged in them, but most
insufferably dull in detail. It will therefore be
sufficient
to say that our three orphans enjoyed
themselves
extremely well.
The attentions of Franklin to Lucy were very
pointed. So much so, that Mr. Matthews was
resolved
should they continue, and the Lieutenant
follow them into Hampshire, to call upon him for
an explanation of his intentions, and candidly state
to him Miss Blakeney's real situation; in order
that should an union take place, such settlements
might be made as should secure to her independence
for life, whatever events might hereafter happen.
The morning after the ball Lady Mary held forth
for a full hour upon the splendid appearance, gallant
manners, and evident admiration of a young baronet,
who had danced, flirted, and flattered, till he had
stirred up a strange commotion in her little vain
heart. Lucy heard her and smiled. Aura smiled
too, but it was with a look of arch meaning, while
she replied to the often repeated question of,
Do you not own he is very handsome?
Why, yes, as far as tolerable features, good eyes
and teeth, with more than tolerable dress goes, I
think he is passable; but my dear Lady Mary, he
has no noble blood in his veins: his Grandfather
was
only
Lord Mayor of London, and you know
you told me your mother would not rest in her
grave if you matched with aught below nobility.
Now, Sir Stephen Haynes's father and his father
before him, were only stationers and booksellers
and who knows, my pretty Mary
Lady
Mary, I
beg your pardonwho knows but this very Sir
Stephen Haynes, may on the female side be a
collateral
descendant of the renowned Whittington,
who made such a fortunate voyage to St. Helena
with his
cat
.
How do you know it was to St. Helena, Aura?
said Mr. Matthews looking up, for he had been
reading in the parlour where the young folks were
talking over the events of the preceding evening.
Oh! I only surmised, sir, because I read in
some geographical work that the island of St. Helena
was infested with rats, so that the inhabitants could
neither raise or preserve grain of any kind upon it,
in which case, a cat must have been a very valuable
animal.
Lady Mary would have left the parlour in a pet,
but that she hoped the Baronet would call in the
course of the morning. He did so, and exercised
the art of flattery so successfully, that Mary Lumley
totally forgot the expressions of her dying mother,
about her degrading herself by a plebeian marriage,
and began to think she could be well content to be
Lady Mary Haynes, though her husband was not
a sprig of nobility.
Mr. Matthews had the interest and happiness of
each of the orphans under his guardianship much
at heart. He thought that Mary Lumley had many
good natural qualities; he saw that they had been
injured by the injudicious conduct of her mother;
he had endeavoured to rectify some of her romantic
notions and in some measure he had succeeded, but
he knew enough of human nature, to be quite aware
that when love and romance unite in the mind of a
volatile young woman, there is scarcely a possibility
of restraining her from taking her own way. Yet
he felt it his duty to inquire into the circumstances
of the Baronet.
In three months Lady Mary would be her own
mistress, and though her fortune was but trifling,
yet settled on herself it might secure to her those
comforts and conveniencies of life to which she had
ever been accustomed. He found upon inquiry,
that Sir Stephen Haynes, though the only son of a
wealthy city knight, had pretty well dissipated his
patrimony, and of the many thousand pounds and
hundred acres he had inherited from his father, all
that remained was Walstead Hall, a handsome seat
in Wiltshire, with gardens, pinery, and farms for
pasturage and tillage annexed, but which was deeply
mortgaged; so that his whole income at that period
would not amount to seven hundred pounds a year.
Mary Lumley has good sense, said he to
himself
,
I will speak to her upon this momentous
subject. For what will her seven thousand pounds
do? It will not clear him of incumbrances, and
when it is gone, what is she to do? Mary, said
he, addressing her one morning when she was alone
with him in the breakfast parlour, does this young
man, who is such a favourite with you, aspire to
your hand?
He loves me, sir, replied she, he has a
noble estate in Wiltshire, is the only son of a good
family, and is willing to make any honourable
arrangements previous to our union.
You have then agreed to accept him?
Lady Mary looked foolish. IIhave not
refused
him, sir.
Well Mary, allow me to tell you that he is a
bankrupt in both fortune and character. He has lost
large sums at the gaming table, has associated with
abandoned women, and unprincipled men. Can you
hope for happiness in an union with such a person?
He may, and I have no doubt will reform, sir.
May
is barely possible,
will
hardly probable.
Men who in early life have associated with profligate
women, form their opinion of the sex in general,
from that early knowledge. They will not believe
any woman capable of resisting temptation, or
practising
self denial on principle, because they have
found dissolute wives, and easy conquests in young
women who are void of religion and virtue. Such
men, Mary, may from passion, or from interest,
protest that they love you:But, the passion
gratified
,
the interested motives either complied with or
disappointed ('tis of no consequence which) the
stimulus loses its force, and the ardent lover sinks
into the domestic tyrant, or the unfeeling savage.
I cannot think, sir, said Lady Mary, that
Sir Stephen will degenerate into either.
I would hope, Mary Lumley, he replied,
that you will not take a step of such consequence
to your future peace as a matrimonial union, without
exercising, not only your own understanding, but
consulting me, the guardian under whom you were
placed, and whose knowledge of the world will
enable him to direct you to avoid those rocks and
quicksands on which the voyagers of youth and
inexperience are liable to be wrecked. I am very
earnest in this cause, I know the delicacy with
which you have been brought up, I am well
acacquainted
with the dangerous, I had almost said
weak sensibility to which you too frequently yield.
It is my duty as your guardian, to take care that
a proper settlement be made before you are
married
.
I shall not marry directly, sir, said she, and
I believe in a short period the law will consider me
of an age to dispose of my own person, and take care
of my own interest.
That is very true, said Mr. Matthews, with a
sigh, but let me conjure you, Lady Mary, not to
be precipitate. Consult your friends. Be advised
by those who love you. Ill could you support the
deprivations a dissipated, heartless husband may
bring upon you: dreadful would be the pangs that
would agonize your heart, when that husband should
treat with contempt and coldness, the woman he
now pretends to idolize.
I cannot believe either possible, sir.
May you never find the suggestions realized,
my poor child. I will however see Sir Stephen,
and speak to him, continued Mr. Matthews.
I must beg you will not, said the young lady
petulantly, Sir Stephen's views must be
disinterested
.
What is my paltry fortune to his estates
and possessions? he says he does not want a shilling
with me.
Then, Mary, let him prove the truth of his
assertion by settling the whole of your fortune on
yourself.
What, sir, when his mind is so liberal, shall I
prove myself a narrow minded selfish wretch, who
has no confidence in the man she is about to make
her husband? No, sir, when I make him master of
my person, I shall also give him possession of my
property, and I trust he is of too generous a
disposition
ever to abuse my confidence. Lady Mary
left the room almost in tears, and Mr. Matthews in
order to compose his temper, which had been
somewhat
irritated by this unpleasant discussion, walked
towards the Stiene.
What is the matter, Lady Mary, said Miss
Blakeney, as she encountered her young associate
on the stairs.
Oh nothing very particular; only my guardian
has been lecturing me about Haynes: as if a young
woman nearly twenty-one was not competent to
conduct herself and judge of her own actions.
Why, as to that, replied Lucy, smiling, as
they entered the drawing room together, some
women are not adequate to the task at forty: but
jesting aside, I sincerely hope you will not take
any decided step in this business contrary to the
advice of Mr. Matthews. You have scarcely known
Sir Stephen Haynes a fortnight, and are almost a
stranger to his temper, habits and principles.
You are nearly as much a stranger to Lieutenant
Franklin, and yet I do not think that you would
refuse him if he offered himself.
You are mistaken, Lady Mary, I have no idea
of romantic attachments, and laugh when I hear of
love at first sight. I should never accept of any
man without the approbation of Mr. Matthews and
my guardian, Sir Robert Ainslie; and I must have
taken leave of my senses, before I should enter into
engagements with a young man not quite twenty,
for I understand Mr. Franklin is nearly a year
younger than myself.
Here the conversation was interrupted by the
entrance of the elder ladies and Aura Melville;
pleasurable engagements occupied the remainder of
the day, and no incident of consequence took place
while they continued at Brighton.
About the middle of September, they returned to
their delightful residence near Southampton, and for
two months, Ainslie, Haynes, and Franklin,
appeared
not in the family circle. The first attended his
father to London; the second was on the turf,
dashing
away upon the credit of intending soon to marry
Lady Mary Lumley, whom he represented as a rich
heiress; and the third confined to Brighton by his
remaining term of duty.
8
CHAPTER VII.
FOLLYRECTITUDEA VISIT TO SERJEANT
BLANDFORD
.
Where in the world can Mary Lumley be,
said Mrs. Cavendish, as the evening drew in, and
the chill air of October reminded the inmates of
Mr. Matthews' mansion, that no one could be
walking
for pleasure at that hour. Lady Mary had gone
out in the morning expressing her intention of
spending
the day with Miss Brenton. Now as it was
customary for Mrs. Brenton's servant to attend the
young lady home if she staid to a late hour, the
family
did not feel much alarmed until ten o'clock
approached. Mr. Matthews broke off a game of
chess he was playing with Lucy, and looked at his
watch, Aura paced the room, and the two elder
ladies expressed much uneasiness.
At length a ring at the gate made them start.
Mr. Matthews in his anxiety preceded the servant
to the door, and was well convinced by the
precipitate
retreat of the person who accompanied Lady
Mary that it was no menial; nay, he fancied that
he saw him kiss her hand, as he opened the door
for her admittance.
You are imprudent, Mary, said the anxious
guardian, to be out so late on this chilly evening,
and with such slight covering. Who was the
person
who parted from you at the door?
A gentleman who dined at Mrs. Brenton's.
And does Lady Mary Lumley allow herself to
be escorted the distance of nearly a mile in an
unfrequented
road, at this hour, by a stranger?
He was no stranger to Mrs. Brenton, sir.
Nor to you, Mary, or I am mistaken.
I have seen him before, said she, hesitating,
I have met him several times, and taking a light
from the sideboard where several were placed, she
left the room.
Mary will throw herself away, said Mrs.
Matthews.
Then she must abide the consequences, replied
Mrs. Cavendish.
Ah, much I fear, rejoined her sister, the
punishment will exceed the offence. That, may be
committed in a moment of romantic folly; but the
bitter repentance that will succeed, may last through
a long and miserable life.
Soon after Christmas, which no circumstances
whatever would have prevented Mr. Matthews from
celebrating in his own mansion and at his own
church, the family removed to London, where a
handsome ready furnished house in Southampton
street, Bloomsbury Square, had been taken for them
by Sir Robert Ainslie. Here Sir Stephen Haynes
renewed his visits, but generally took care to call
when he was sure of meeting other company, and
assiduously avoided giving Mr. Matthews an
opportunity
of speaking to him alone. His manners to
Lady Mary were polite, but distant, and her
guardian
began to surmise that he had altered his plans,
and had some wealthier prize in view; he was
therefore
thrown off his guard, and determined to take no
further notice of the subject to his fair ward.
The seventeenth of February was Lady Mary's
birth day, that ardently desired day which freed her
from the trammels of restraint, and made her, as she
joyously expressed it, when Lucy and Aura
affectionately
kissed her and gave their congratulations,
a free and independent agent.
Then, said Aura, seriously, I hope you will
remain so at least for some years: enjoy this liberty
you seem to prize so much; for, be assured there
are shackles much less endurable than the salutary
restraints of the excellent Mr. Matthews and his
revered
wife and sister, and not so easily thrown off.
At one o'clock, the writings necessary being
prepared
,
Lady Mary was put in possession of her little
fortune. When all was finished, Mrs. Matthews
expressed her hope that she would remain in their
family at least during the ensuing summer. She
answered
,
formally, that she had not yet determined
how she should dispose of herself; she should remain
with them during the time she staid in London, and
then in all probability make a visit to her friend
Miss Brenton.
About three weeks after this event, Lieutenant
Franklin made a short visit to London, paid his
respects to Lucy and her guardian's family,
lamented
that his father's ill health obliging him to pass the
winter in Bath, he could not have the pleasure of
making her acquainted with persons she was
prepared
so highly to esteem. And for myself, Miss
Blakeney, continued he, I shall not be so happy
as to see you above once more, as I have only a
fortnight's
leave of absence, and must devote the larger
part of that time to attentions to my suffering father,
and in striving to soothe and cheer the depressed
spirits of my mother. But in June, I hope, my
dear sir, turning to Mr. Matthews, to be
permitted
to pay my respects to you in Hampshire.
Mr. Matthews expressed the pleasure it would
give him to see him there, reflecting at the same
time that at the period of the intended visit, he
should decide upon the conduct to be observed in
developing his intentions towards Lucy.
It was now determined that before Easter, Mr.
Matthews and his family should return to their
pleasant residence near Southampton. Lucy and
Aura were delighted to leave London and return to
inhale the sweets of the opening Spring and
invigorating
breezes from the sea. Lady Mary appeared
indifferent; but three days before their intended
departure
,
she shewed Miss Blakeney a letter which
she had received from Miss Brenton, which stated
that she was going to pass Easter with an aunt who
lived near Windsor, and entreated Lady Mary to
accompany her.
I never was at Windsor, Miss Blakeney, and
I should like to see that celebrated castle. I have
heard my poor mother talk of it.
As Lady Mary pronounced the words,
poor
mother
, a deep blush suffused her face and neck,
and her voice faltered almost to a sob, as she finished
the sentence. Lucy Blakeney did not want
discernment
;
8*
she looked earnestly at Lady Mary, and
catching her hand, said tenderly, yet emphatically,
But do not go to see it now, dear Mary, go
with us into Hampshire, and I promise you when I
am of age, which you know will be soon, we will
make a most delectable excursion, take dear Guardy
and Ma-Matthews, majestic Mrs. Cavendish and
our lively Aura, and setting out in search of
adventures
,
storm Windsor Castle in the course of our
route; and you shall repeat all your lamented mother
told you, for you know she was better acquainted
with history than we are, especially when it was
any thing concerning Kings and Princes, Dukes
and Lords.
Now all this was said in a playful good humoured
manner: But at her heart Lucy feared this excursion
with Miss Brenton would lead to no good.
I cannot retract my promise, dear Lucy, said
Mary, in a soft tremulous voice, Miss Brenton will
be in town to-night, and will call for me to-morrow
as she proceeds to Windsor.
Would it not have been as well to have
consulted
Lucy
would have proceeded, but Lady Mary
stopped her with, I cannot consent to ask leave of
the stiff Mr. Matthews, his precise Lady, and the
dictatorial Mrs. Cavendish.
Oh fie! Lady Mary, replied Lucy, with
something of sternness in her voice: can you
forget
the parental kindness they have shewn you for
five years past? You will say, perhaps, the interest
of your fortune, paid for your board, &c. True,
those pecuniary debts were amply discharged. But
who can repay the debt of gratitude due to those
who cultivate the best feelings of the heart, and
direct
the understanding to the highest sources of
improvement
,
whose precept and example go hand in
hand to lead inexperienced youth into the path of
happiness?
I never shall forget what I owe them, Miss
Blakeney, she replied, but I cannot consent to
solicit permission to do what I like, and go where I
please, from persons who, however good in their
way, have no right now to control me. I shall
myself
mention my intention to the family, at the
breakfast
table to-morrow morning. Miss Brenton will
commence her journey about noon, and will call for
me; in the mean time I must beg it as a favour,
you will not disclose this conversation to any one.
When she had left the room, Lucy stood for a
moment irresolute what course to pursue. It will
do no good, said she mentally, to distress the
family by mentioning this intended excursion, which
however they may disapprove, they cannot prevent;
and perhaps I judge too hardly of Lady Mary,
when I think there is some other point in view than
merely visiting Windsor Castle. Thus resolving
upon silence, she joined the family at dinner, and
found, to her surprise, that Lady Mary had
complained
of a head ache and requested to have some
trifling refreshment in her own apartment.
The next morning at breakfast, no Lady Mary
appeared, and when the footman was desired to send
one of the female servants to call her, he replied,
Lady Mary is not in the house.
Not in the house? cried Mr. Matthews,
starting from his chair, poor stray lamb, I fear
the shepherd too easily gave up his trust, and thou
wilt return no more to the fold.
Mrs. Matthews turned deathly pale, and leaned
back in her chair.
It is no more than I expected, said Mrs.
Cavendish, drawing herself up and taking a cup of
tea from the trembling hand of Aura.
Be not too much alarmed, said Lucy
Blakeney
,
I believe Lady Mary was engaged in a
pleasurable excursion to Windsor, with Miss
Brenton
,
who arrived in town last evening, and was
proceeding thither to visit her aunt. She mentioned
it to me yesterday, but said they should not leave
town till noon, and that at breakfast she would take
leave of the family. Perhaps her friend went earlier
than she expected, and Mary Lumley did not like
to have the family disturbed, but I have no doubt
she has left some letter or message.
Lady Mary left the house at four o'clock in the
morning, said the footman, she went out through
the area, because she was afraid of making a noise
to alarm any one, the chaise did not draw up to the
house, but stood at the bottom of the street. Betty,
the house maid, took her bandbox, and I carried her
trunk, when on her jumping in I saw she was
received
by a gentleman, and a lady seemed to be in
the farther corner. There were four horses to the
chaise, and a groom in livery followed it on
horseback
.
`To Windsor,' said the gentleman, as the
door was shut, and they went off like lightning.
Call Betty, this instant, said Mr. Matthews.
Betty appeared. Where is Lady Mary Lumley
gone? said he.
To Windsor, with her friend Miss Brenton,
she replied, pertly.
Did she leave no letter or message, girl?
Lawes me, yes, there is a letter up stairs for
you, I believes.
Go fetch it, instantly.
Stop, said he, when the girl gave him a sealed
billet, why did you assist her out of the house in
so clandestine a manner? Why not boldly open the
front door, have the carriage drawn up, and call one
of my servants to have adjusted her baggage, and if
necessary to have proceeded with her?
'Cause the poor dear lady cried, and said you and
my ladies there wanted to make a slave of her,
when she was as free to act for herself as you was,
and if you knew of her going you would try to stop
her.
'Tis well, go! said Mr. Matthews, waving
his hand. Betty withdrew with an impertinent toss
of her head, and Mr. Matthews opened the letter.
It ran thus:
SIR,
I am sensible you will blame the step
I am about to take, but I cannot be happy unless as
the wife of Sir Stephen Haynes. Before you will
receive this, I shall be considerably advanced on the
road to Scotland, not that, being my own mistress,
any one has a right to control me, but I dreaded
expostulation
,
shuddered at the idea of published banns,
or a formal wedding by license, with settlements,
lawyers, and parchments. These things have, I
believe
,
little to do with love.
But they have a great deal to do with prudence,
I conceive, said the agitated Rector, pausing a
moment
from the perusal of the letter.
Sir Stephen, he at length proceeded, has
promised to settle half his fortune on me, as a
voluntary
act of gratitude after I am his wife, and in
return
for this liberality I have given my little fortune
into his hands. He talks of purchasing a peerage,
and I begin to have different ideas of nobility since
he has convinced me that all by nature are equal,
and that distinctions have been always purchased by
some means or other; and what matter is it whether
by fighting for the rights of the monarch, or by
advancing
money to supply his necessities.
My dear friend Miss Brenton accompanies me
to Scotland, I shall, after a short tour, visit her in
Hampshire, then, having taken a view of Sir
Stephen's
place in Wiltshire, and given our orders for
repairs, new furnishing, &c. we shall make an
excursion
of a few months to the continent. On our
return we shall pay our respects to you in
Hampshire
,
and solicit a visit from any of the inmates of
your mansion who may feel disposed so to honour
us. I beg you to accept my thanks for your care of
my interest and happiness, although we happened
not to think alike upon the latter subject, and make
my acknowledgments to Mrs. Matthews and the
other ladies of the family for their kind attentions.
I am, Sir, with Respect
and Esteem,
MARY LUMLEY.
Mr. Matthews folded the letter. The die is
east, said he, poor Mary Lumley, thou art fallen
into bad hands. Settle half his fortune! according
to the course he has pursued, by this time he may
not have an acre of land, or a single guinea he can
call his own.That Miss Brenton has been of great
injury to the unfortunate girl, for nothing can be
more prejudicial to a young woman of strong
imagination
and ill regulated feelings, than those kind of
artificial friendships and tender confidences, where
flattery is substituted for real affection, and mutual
self-complacency for disinterested attachment; where
self willed folly is dignified with the name of
enthusiastic
liberality of sentiment, and the excitement of
gratified vanity is mistaken for unchangeable,
exalted
love; such, I am persuaded, was the only
friendship that subsisted between Julia Brenton, and
our thoughtless Mary Lumley, and by her she has
been led on to adopt the idea of All for Love or
the World well lost, and to act upon that
mischievous
,
I could almost say dissolute principle.
I always knew Lady Mary to be vain and
thoughtless, and from the romantic bias given to her
early ideas easily led and highly enthusiastic, said
Aura Melville, but I do believe her mind is
pure.
There is the misery of it! said Mr. Matthews,
sighing, for when that pure mind shall discover
that it has allied itself to sensuality and profligacy,
that it has chosen for its associate a being who will
divide his time between jockeys and gamesters;
and that he is never so happy as when in company
with men and women of low breeding and gross
conversation, what must it feel?
No answer was made. The breakfast was
removed
almost untasted; no steps however could be
taken to prevent this ill starred union. Mr.
Matthews
walked to Sir Robert Ainslie's, and
discovered
that the whole of Lady Mary's fortune had been
the day before withdrawn from his hands, where it
had been placed by her guardian on delivering up
his trust, by an order under her own signature.
What, all? principal and the few hundreds of
interest I had saved for her, that she might have a
little store to supply her purse upon coming of age?
All, replied Sir Robert, I was not aware of
the circumstance till this morning, and was
preparing
to call on you when you were announced.
The order was in favour of Julia Brenton. There
was no authority by which we could refuse to pay
it.
Certainly not, said Mr. Matthews, but she
has ruined herself.
The second morning after this very painful
occurrence
,
Mr. Matthews' family set off towards home,
where they arrived in safety, and with real pleasure
took possession of their old apartments, and began
to pursue their usual avocations in that beloved
mansion, reading, working, walking, arranging their
plants and flowers, in the garden, and greenhouse,
and occasionally riding round the country,
accompanied
by their paternal friend the Rector.
Mr. Matthews took an early opportunity to call
on Mrs. Brenton, but the old lady knew nothing of
her daughter's plans, had received but one letter
from her since her departure. That indeed was
dated from Windsor, but she appeared totally
ignorant
of the marriage of Lady Mary, or the active
part her daughter had taken in the affair.
Lucy and Aura recommenced their rambles to the
cottages of their poor neighbours, nor was the old
sergeant forgotten, and be it known, that though
Miss Blakeney sometimes thought that June would
increase their party, yet was she never heard to
complain of the leaden wings of time, or to sigh
profoundly, and look interestingly sentimental.
The latter end of June brought Sir Robert
Ainslie's
family to their seat in Hampshire, and a few
days after, Lieutenant Franklin, to visit his friend
Edward.
Lucy, my love, said Mr. Matthews, a few
days after the arrival of these young men in their
neighbourhood, Will you candidly answer me one
question, and seriously make me one promise?
I will answer any question you may please to
make, very honestly, my dear sir, said she smiling,
and as to promises, I am convinced you would
require none but what was meant to secure my
happiness.
9
Now, my good girl, to put you to the test, has
Mr. Franklin ever made any professions to you, or
sought more than by general attentions to engage
your affections?
Never, sir, Mr. Franklin never uttered a
syllable
to me that could be construed into any thing
more than that politeness and gallantry which
gentlemen
of his profession think incumbent upon them
to pay to our sex. A slight blush tinged her face
as she spoke.
But, my dear Lucy, have you never thought
those polite gallantries, as you term them, were
sometimes a little particular?
The thoughtshe replied with a little
hesitation
.
But pray do not think me a vain girl, I
have thought his looks and manner said more than
his words.
Good, ingenuous girl, said the Rector, and
you would not be displeased if you found yourself
the object of his affection.Well, well, he
continued
,
I will not insist on an answer to this last
question. But now to your promise.
Name it, sir.
It is that you will enter into no engagements
of a matrimonial kind till you have seen your
twenty-first birth day. I have a letter in my
possession
written by your grandfather in the last hour
of his life. It was designed to be delivered to you
when your minority ended; you surely remember
how very suddenly that good man was called out of
time into eternity.
Can I ever forget it? replied Lucy, with
emotion. He had retired to his study as all
imagined
for a few hours repose, which it was his
custom
to take of an afternoon, and was found dead
in his easy chair, I think I was told with a written
paper before him, and the pen still between his
fingers.
It was so, my child, I was in the house at the
time, where I arrived after he had retired, and that
paper was an unfinished letter to you. Promise me,
therefore, Lucy, that you will enter into no serious
engagements till you have read that letter.
I do promise most solemnly, and also
voluntarily
add, that every behest in the letter of that dear
lamented parent, shall be adhered to by me.
I know I can depend on you, replied Mr.
Matthews, and am satisfied.
A few days after this conversation, Franklin
having
taken his tea at the Rectory, proposed a walk,
and Aura being engaged in some domestic concerns
which Mrs. Matthews had requested her to see
performed, Lucy accepted the invitation. I will
take this young soldier to the cottage of my old
friend Serjeant Blandford, said she to Mr.
Matthews
,
and he shall tell him some of his famous
stories, and fight over his battles.
It was a very fine evening, but as the sun
descended
,
a dark cloud received the glorious orb,
which as it shrouded his beams, transfused their
radiance to itself, making the edges of its deep
purple tint flame with gold and crimson.
That cloud foretels a shower, I think, said
Lucy, as approaching the old man's dwelling she
turned her eyes for the first time towards the
declining
sun.
It will not come on very rapidly, said
Franklin
.
We will make a short visit to the old soldier,
said she. Then looking stedfastly at the advancing
cloud, she continued, That cloud is an emblem of
misfortune overwhelming for a while the virtuous
person; which though for a time it may prevent
their general usefulness, and obscure the splendor
of their actions, cannot entirely hide their brilliancy,
but catches as it were a glory from the radiance it
partially obscures.
Or rather, said Franklin, it is like a veil
thrown over the face of a beautiful woman, which
shades but cannot diminish her loveliness.
Before they reached old Blandford's hut, the
cloud had spread rapidly and large drops of rain
had fallen, so that Lucy's muslin dress was but a
poor defence, and was easily wet through. She had
thrown a black lace mantle over her shoulders
when she began her walk, but pulling it off as she
rushed into the house, and at the same time
divesting
her head of a straw cottage bonnet, her
redundant
hair fell over her face and shoulders.
Bless me, is it you, Miss Blakeney? said the
old man, rising and supporting himself with his
crutch.
Yes, it is, good Blandford, and finely wet I am,
but I use myself so much to all changes of
atmosphere
that I do not fear taking cold. I walked
very fast when it began to rain, and am incommoded
by the heat. So let me sit down, and give me a
draught of water.
Drink sparingly, said Franklin.
At the sound of his voice old Blandford started,
and looking first at one and then at the other, asked,
Who is this, Miss Lucy?
My name is Franklin, said the lieutenant,
and I come to visit an old brother soldier. He
then presented the veteran his hand, who gazing
earnestly on him exclaimed, I could almost have
sworn that you werebut I'm an old fool, it is
impossible
and
this dear lady has often made me
think I had seen her face before, though not till this
moment could I bring to mind whom she was so like.
But just as she is now, only paler and in great
distress
,
I once sawhe paused
Saw whom? said Lucy.
It is a melancholy story, Miss, and you will not
like to hear it, mayhap.
I have no objection to hear it, if it is not very
long, for the rain is almost over, and the moment it
ceases, we must set off toward home.
Blandford stretched out his disabled leg, rested
his chin on the handle of his crutch, and thus
began
.
You know, Miss Blakeney, I served abroad
several years, and got my wound fighting with the
.
Well, never mind, you have told me all that
before, now to your story.
9*
Why, Miss, it was one cold night about the
end of October, 1774, I was but a private then,
when as I had been to the Colonel's quarters for
orders, as I went from the door, a poor shivering
young creature, her face pale as death, and nothing
over her but a thin white gown, and a black
something
,
like that you threw off just now, though the
snow was falling fast, and the wind was very
bleak.
Just then Mr. Matthews' carriage drove up to the
cottage, and a request was delivered to Miss
Blakeney
that she would return in it, as her friends feared
she might take cold. The sergeant was therefore
obliged te break off his story, when it was scarcely
begun, Lucy saying,
You shall tell it me some other time, my good
Blandford, but now good night.
Lieutenant Franklin handed her into the coach,
bowing as he laughingly said, A soldier is not
afraid of the damp arising from a trifling shower,
so I shall walk back to Sir Robert Ainslie's.
This delicate conduct was not lost upon Miss
Blakeney, and raised the young man in the
estimation
of Mr. Matthews.
A short time after this, Mr. Franklin openly
made a declaration of his sentiments to Lucy, who
referred him to her guardian for the reason why
she could not give a decided answer till her
twenty-first
birth day was passed. When Franklin heard
that Miss Blakeney was in reality a wealthy heiress,
instead of the dependant orphan he had depicted in
his own mind, and found that he must adopt her
name or relinquish her fortune, he felt something
like hesitation; he had already laid aside his own
family name and assumed that of his grandfather.
I will be candid, my dear sir, said he,
happiness
to me appears unattainable unless in a union
with Miss Blakeney, but I must consult my father,
and I fear he will never consent to my changing the
venerated name I now bear for any other. You
know fortune has not been an object with me, for
I loved and would have married your ward, though
she had nothing but her invaluable self to bestow:
but I cannot reconcile it to my own sense of
integrity
to despoil her of so fair an independence, which
entitles her to those appendages and elegancies,
which my moderate fortune could not afford.
You are a worthy young man, said Mr.
Matthews
,
persevere in this course of integrity, and
perhaps things may turn out so, as to obviate these
difficulties. At any rate you will avoid self
reproach
,
and happiness is so hardly attainable in this
world, that it would be a pity while too eagerly
pursuing it, to run the risk of mingling gall with
the honey.
When Franklin took leave of Lucy, she held out
her hand, and he pressed it to his lips. Her eyes
were evidently full, while with a tremulous voice
she said,
Remember I have entered into no engagements,
and whatever the import of my grandfather's letter
may be, I am firmly resolved to abide by his
directions
.
You have requested leave to commence
a correspondence; you must allow me to decline it.
It could be of no service. When the time comes
that I shall see this formidable letter, you shall hear
either from Mr. Matthews or myself the result:
and let that be what it may, I shall ever retain a
most grateful sense of your disinterested attachment,
and if no nearer tie can ever connect us, I shall
ever regard you as a friend and brother.
She then hastily left the room and shut herself in
her own apartment, to give vent to feelings she was
unwilling to have witnessed, though she was unable
to suppress. Franklin returned to Sir Robert
Ainslie's
,
from whence, at an early hour next morning,
he departed with his young friend for London.
CHAPTER VIII.
UNPLEASANT DISCOVERYBITTER REPENTANCE.
Though
Sir Stephen Haynes had proposed to the
credulous Lady Mary the delightful excursions which
she stated in her letter to Mr. Matthews, he never
seriously intended any other excursion than the one
that made him master of her fortune, and indeed
could he have obtained possession of that without
incumbering himself with her person, he would
gladly have done it. When however the hymeneal
knot was tied, and the romantic, thoughtless girl
had paid him the seven thousand pounds, he
carelessly
asked her if she had reserved any for her own
use. Miss Brenton, who was present, not giving
her friend time to speak, answered for her,
Certainly
,
Sir Stephen, Lady Mary has retained a trifle
for her pocket expenses, till you have the
settlements
properly adjusted, and can pay her first
quarter.
Sir Stephen looked out of the window and began
to whistle. Miss Brenton laid her finger on her lip,
looking earnestly at Lady Mary to impose silence
upon her, for the truth was she had persuaded her
to retain five hundred pounds, which was the sum
Mr. Matthews had mentioned as having laid by for
her, during her minority.
It will be time enough to talk of these things
when we have been to Wiltshire, said the new
made bride. Sir Stephen will then make his own
generous arrangements, and I shall not have occasion
for much money till I get to London, when I must
have an entire new wardrobe, have the few jewels
my mother left me more fashionably setYou will
have a new carriage, I presume, Sir Stephen,
addressing her husband, and new liveries?
I don't know that I shall have either, madam,
said he. It was the first time he had ever addressed
her by the formal title of madam. She looked at
him and her colour varied, but thinking he might
suppose that she wished to hurry to London, she
said,
I did not mean that we should go directly there,
if we are only there time enough to have every
thing ready for the birth day, when I shall expect
to be presented by some of my mother's relations.
Then you will be disappointed, he replied,
sharply, for, I do not think I shall go to London
at all. It is a devilish expensive place, and you
cannot suppose that your fortune entitles you to form
such expectations, however your ladyship's rank
may be.
I never deceived you in regard to my fortune,
Sir Stephen, she answered, her lip beginning to
quiver, and a choaking sensation to arise in her
throat.
But I suppose you knew that your
accommodating
friend there had done it; she represented
your fortune more than quadruple the paltry sum
you have given me.
I have given you all, Sir Stephen, said she,
and had it been a thousand times as much, would
have given it as freely. She hid her face with her
handkerchief, and burst into an hysterical sob.
Oh, pray don't let us have a crying match so
early in the honey moon, said he, I hate
whimpering
,
it spoils a pretty face and makes an ugly
one detestable. He snatched up his hat, and
sauntered
out.
It may be easily imagined what a young woman
of such uncontrollable feelings as Lady Mary, must
have endured, at this discovery of the selfish
disposition
of a man to whom she had entrusted her all
of fortune, her all of earthly felicityshe threw
herself
into the arms of Miss Brenton and exclaimed,
Theresa, why have you done this? I thought
him disinterested, I thought he loved me for myself,
why, why did you lead him to thinkMy dear
Mary, said Miss Brenton soothingly, how can
you blame me? I did not know the extent of your
fortune, you were reputed an heiress, your guardian
never contradicted the report, and knowing how
immensely rich Sir Stephen was left by his father,
I rejoiced in the prospect of seeing my dear friend,
so amiable, so lovely, united to a man able to add
to her exalted rank the gifts of fortune. And when
I knew your sensitive heart was engaged by him,
I thought in promoting your union, I was
promoting
your happiness.
Forgive my petulance, Theresa, said Lady
Mary, drying her eyes, but what must I do, how
must I conduct myself?
Let it be remembered that Lady Mary was but a
wife of three days, for on their return from Scotland
they had stopped at Alnwick in Northumberland,
where so much of antiquity and ancient splendor
were to be seen, connected with historic tales of
chivalry and renown, that Mary Lumley, as she
passed through it on her imprudent expedition, had
expressed a wish to stop on her return, and view
the castle, the gates of the town, and other objects,
to which her enthusiastic spirit of romance, had
given the highest interest.
Accordingly, on the second night of their
retrograde
journey, they stopped at an old fashioned but
well attended comfortable inn, in the ancient town
of Alnwick; not very far from the beautiful seat
so long descended from father to son in the noble
family of Percy, of Northumberland. On the
second
morning after her arrival there, the scene took
place, which led to the question of what must I
do? how must I conduct myself?
Struggle to suppress your feelings, said Miss
Brenton, when Sir Stephen returns receive him
with composure, and on no account let him know
of the small sum you have retained, for from all I
see and hear, I suspect it will be some time before
you gain any thing from him.
Theresa Brenton was an artful, selfish young
woman
,
her mother was a widow with a small jointure,
and Theresa, with a very trifling fortune of her own,
looked round for ways and means to lead a life of
case and affluence, without infringing on a small
patrimony
inherited from her father, except to supply
the articles of clothing and pocket money. She had
early began to try her talent at flattery upon Lucy
Blakeney, but Lucy had too much sense to be led,
or hoodwinked by soft speeches, and a yielding
versatility
of manners. She was always polite, and
treated Miss Brenton with that suavity of demeanour
which was her general characteristic; but she could
not love her as an associate, nor confide in her as a
friend.
Lady Mary Lumley had been accustomed to the
voice of adulation from her earliest remembrance;
she had observed how subservient her governess
always was to the will of her mother; she never
contradicted her, and if at any time she was
unreasonably
petulant, from ennui, or irritable nerves,
she was always silent, or soothed her into good
humour
again. Lady Mary thought this a proof of the
strongest affection; she loved her governess, who
was equally indulgent to her foibles, and glossed them
over with the name of amiable weaknesses.
It may be here observed, that a conduct which
was kind and consoling, to a woman formerly
followed
and courted by an admiring world, moving in the
most splendid circles, indulged in every wish of her
heart, but who was now weak in health, depressed
in fortune, and neglected by that world; it was the
height of cruelty to practice toward a young
creature
just entering into life.
When after the death of her mother Lady Mary
was removed to the regular well conducted family
of Mr. Matthews, where a kind of sedate
cheerfulness
went hand in hand with rational amusement
and mental improvement; the change was so great
that she was glad to meet a more congenial associate
in Theresa Brenton. The consequence was, that
they became in the language of romantic misses,
sworn friends
. Lady Mary would complain of
the formality of Mrs. Cavendish, the strictness of
Mr. Matthews, and the undeviating preciseness of
his wife. Miss Brenton would reply, I feel for
you, my dear Mary, it must be very painful to your
sensitive mind, but be patient, it cannot last forever,
and the time will arrive when, being your own
mistress
,
you can indulge those amiable sensibilities
which throw a fascinating charm around you, and
whilst constituting your own happiness, render you
the delight of all who know you.
In the mean time Theresa Brenton would, when
Mary Lumley received her quarterly allowance,
accompany
her from
pure good nature
, on her
shopping
10
expeditions, and when her friend purchased
any elegant or expensive article, would lament, that
she had not the power to indulge herself in any thing
beyond usefulness, when often the thoughtless, yet
generous minded Mary, would suffer considerable
depredations on her purse, rather than dear Theresa
should feel the want of an article, that would set off
her pretty person so well, but which her confined
finances would not allow her to purchase.
Miss Brenton was herself deceived in regard to
Sir Stephen's fortune, when following Lady Mary
from Brighton he contrived to get an introduction
to the family, where he found he could make a
staunch auxiliary by a profusion of protestations and
a few showy presents. His equipage and dress were
so elegant, his disregard of expense so evident, that
both Mrs. and Miss Brenton conceived his revenues
to be immense, and Theresa thought by assisting
her
friend
in eluding her guardian's watchfulness
and forming a matrimonial union with Sir Stephen,
she should secure to herself an invitation to pass one
winter at least in London, during which period she
might secure an establishment for herself, and, another
season, dash forth, at parties, balls and routs, at the
opera, theatre, or masquerade, as the rival or
superior
of her
angelic friend
Lady Mary Haynes.
She therefore pretended not to know the extent of
Lady Mary's fortune, but led the scheming selfish
Baronet to conclude that it was above twenty
thousand
pounds.
Mary Lumley herself would have spurned at such
an imposition, but Mary Lumley never made that
mental exertion which is necessary when persons
mean to judge and decide for themselves. She had
been blindly led by the flattery and opinions of
Theresa
Brenton, and was taught to believe that in
asking
for or submitting to the advice of Mr. Matthews,
she was making herself a slave to the will of one who
being old and fastidious, was incapable of deciding
upon what would constitute the happiness of a young
and beautiful woman.
But Theresa Brenton in abetting the elopement
had overreached herself. She had no idea that
when she received, by Lady Mary's order, the
whole of her little fortune from Sir Robert Ainslie,
that the innocent confiding girl meant to give it
unconditionally
to her husband, before he had made
the promised settlements, which even at that time
she had no doubt that he had the power to make.
But when she found it impossible to persuade her
from so doing, she strongly urged her to retain the
five hundred pounds in her own hands.
When dinner was announced and the ladies met
Sir Stephen, Lady Mary strove to smile, Miss
Brenton
was remarkably cheerful, and when the cloth
was removed, he made a proposal to visit Alnwick
castle that afternoon. The smiles naturally returned
to the face of his bride, and the carriage being
ordered
,
they proceeded to the stately mansion of the
Percys.
Sir Stephen knew when he made the proposal
that some of the family being at that time in
Northumberland
,
it was not likely that they would be
admitted to view the castle; and when he received
for answer on applying for admittance at the porter's
lodge, that there was company there at present,
turning to Lady Mary, he said,
Well, it can't be helped, but we will take a
drive round to view a little romantic spot which I
am sure you will be pleased with; when I went out
this morning, I met a friend I had not seen for
many years who now lives within a short distance
of Alnwick, I walked with him to his house where
he resides with his mother, and from thence, on one
of his horses, accompanied him on a ride in this
delightful country, where there is so much to gratify
both the taste and the judgment.
As they rode along, Sir Stephen was uncommonly
attentive and entertaining. At an opening from a
wood, he pointed out a cottage, built in the antique
style, with a garden gay with early spring flowers
and surrounded by a small patch of ground in which
were a variety of beautiful flowering shrubs, though
they now only shewed their under green leaves.
The ladies both exclaimed,
Well, what a lovely place, it is just a situation
to realize the idea of love in a cottage.
Sir Stephen bade the postillion drive up to the
gate.
Come, said he, we will alight and get some
tea here. There will be a fine moon this evening,
and we shall have a pleasant drive afterwards.
But Miss Brenton observed, that she thought the
road they had come was very lonely; they had seen
but few passengers and those not very prepossessing
in their looks.
Besides, said Lady Mary, this is certainly
not a house of entertainment.
We shall try that, said he, jumping out, and
insisting on the ladies alighting, he led the way up
to an old fashioned porch, over which climbed the
woodbine, and sweet brier, just bursting into
vegetation
.
An elderly woman opened the door and
ushered them into a not inelegant, but small parlour.
Where is Mr. Craftly? asked Sir Stephen.
I expect him in every moment, your honour!
said the woman, whom we will call Janet, and he
told me should your honour arrive before him, to
shew the ladies their rooms, and obey their orders
in every thing.
The ladies were struck almost dumb with
astonishment
.
Our rooms? why, are we to remain here
all night? faintly articulated Lady Mary.
Your lady, Sir Stephen, has no night clothes
here, said Miss Brenton, with rather more firmness
of voice, and how can we be accommodated in this
little place.
Pho! Theresa, he replied, half jocularly, don't
raise obstacles where none really exist: I have
ordered
the trunks to be brought, I did not like our
situation
at the Inn, and my friend having offered me the
use of this cottage for a short period, I concluded it
would just suit Lady Mary's taste, and you know
you both declared just now it was exactly the
situation
to realize the idea of
love in a cottage
.
True, said Lady Mary, with a slight degree of
acrimony, but I do not know how I shall like
the cottage without the love.
10*
At this moment Craftly entered, and Sir Stephen
taking his arm walked into the little shrubbery.
What can this mean, Theresa? inquired the
pale and agitated bride. Miss Brenton shrugged her
shoulders, but remained silent; and they concluded
to go and inspect the apartments.
The cottage consisted of two parlours, a kitchen
and four bed chambers, neatly but not elegantly
furnished.
I won't stay here, said Lady Mary.
But how shall we get away? rejoined her
companion
,
for I believe the carriage is gone in which
we came. But be patient, dear Mary, this may only
be a little frolic of Sir Stephen's to try your temper.
Take no notice, ask no questions, endeavour to be
cheerful, and all may be well yet. He knew your
mother's attachment to rank and splendor, he may
fear that you inherit her family pride.
I wish to Heaven I had! she ardently replied,
I should never have fallen into this humiliating
situation.
Well, what is done cannot be undone, said
Theresa with a non-chalance surprizing to her friend.
At tea, though Mary was calm, she could not be
cheerful. Miss Brenton was rather silent and
observant
.
Craftly stayed the evening, and after
supper
challenged Sir Stephen to a game at piquet. The
ladies retired to their chambers, where they found
their trunks, but on looking round Lady Mary
missed
her dressing case, in which were her jewels and
all her money except about twenty-five guineas
which were in Theresa's purse.
She had inquired into the establishment of the
cottage, and found it consisted only of the elderly
person she had first seen, who acted as cook and
housekeeper, and a rude country girl, who was to
attend the ladies and take care of the chambers; a
half grown boy, to clean knives and attend at meal
times, and a poor old crone who occasionally came
to superintend the garden and grounds. The girl
accustomed to early hours, was gone to bed; the
woman thought her work was finished when the
supper table was cleared, and the boy expressed his
discontent when he found he must sit up to wait on
the gentlemen.
When, therefore, Lady Mary, on retiring to her
room, found no one to assist her in undressing, or to
go to Sir Stephen to inquire for her dressing case,
Miss Brenton, who felt more alarmed than she was
willing to own, snatched up the candle, for there
was but one in the apartment, and without apology,
hastened back to the parlour.
Sir Stephen, said she, throwing open the door,
your lady's dressing case is not come
Well, he replied, what of that? I suppose
she can do without it for one night, lend her some
of your things, Theresa, for I believe
they
are come.
They may be, but I was so disturbed upon
missing
this valuable case, (for it belonged to your lady's
mother, and she prizes it very highly,) that I did
not look for, or even think of my own things.
Well, well, I dare say it is safe enough, I will
see about it to-morrow, so good Theresa, do go now,
and leave us to play our game in peace.
What a fool I have been, and how I have misled
poor Lady Mary, said Miss Brenton, mentally, as
she ascended the stairs. But endeavouring to
suppress
her feelings, and look cheerful as she entered
the room where her friend was undressing, she said,
The box will be here to-morrow, you must
condescend
,
dear Mary, to use my dressing apparatus
to-night
and in the morning, I hope we shall prevail
on Sir Stephen to give up the wild scheme of
staying
any time in this cottage, and commence a journey
if not to London, at least into Hampshire, where I
am sure my mother will be happy to receive you
till Sir Stephen can look round and settle in a proper
habitation.
After a few remarks, not very pleasant to either
party, the ladies separated, but though they retired
to bed, sleep visited neither of them till nearly
daylight
.
When it did overtake them, it was so
profound
that they did not wake till after nine in the
morning.
Lady Mary on looking round soon perceived Sir
Stephen had not been in bed all night. A vague
sensation of desolateness struck upon her heart:
she started up, searched for a bell, no bell was to be
found. She opened the chamber door and called
aloud for Theresa, and in a few moments, wrapped
only in a dressing grown, her friend entered the room.
Sir Stephen has not been in his apartment all
night, Theresa, what can be the meaning of all this?
she exclaimed wildly. Before Miss Brenton could
reply, Janet who had been listening hearing the ladies
speak, came up to say that breakfast had been ready
above an hour.
Where is your Master? good woman, asked
Miss Brenton, as calmly as she could.
My Master? Mr. Craftly, does your Ladyship
mean. He walked out with his honour Sir Stephen,
before five o'clock, and said he should not return
to breakfast; but Dora when she was cleaning the
parlour where their honours played cards last night,
sawed this bit of paper, but what it's about we can't
tell, for neither she nor I can read joining hand.
Before Janet had finished her harangue, Theresa
had snatched the note from her hand, eagerly broke
the seal, and read as follows,
TO MISS THERESA BRENTON,
You cannot be surprised, Theresa, after
the explanation which took place between Lady
Mary and myself yesterday, that I should declare
my utter inability to make those settlements which
I talked of before our excursion to the north. I
must beg you to make my acknowledgments to the
dear generous girl for all marks of favour and
kindness
bestowed by her on her unworthy, humble
servant, but my finances are in such a state, that
it is totally impossible for me to take a journey to
Wilts, as proposed, or to solicit her company to
France, whither I must repair as speedily as possible,
to rusticate; whilst my affairs in England are put in
train to restore me to some comparative degree of
affluence. My friend, Richard Craftly, Esq. has
offered
the cottage to you and your lovely friend as long
as you may please to occupy it. He is, Miss
Brenton
,
a man of good abilities, amiable disposition, and
possessed of a small but genteel and unincumbered
estate, which upon the death of his mother will be
augmented. He will call on you this afternoon, I
recommend him to your notice
. My best wishes
attend you and your fair associate Lady Mary.
I am, Dear Theresa,
Your Obliged friend, &c. &c.
STEPHEN HAYNES.
Give it me, give me that letter, Theresa!
exclaimed Lady Mary, snatching it from Miss Brenton. Her frenzied eye glanced rapidly over its
contents
,
and muttering,
Friend! associate!
yes, it flashes on my mind,
I have no certificate; he gives me no name. I am
undone! undone!Oh! my Guardian, my dear!
kind Lucy.
The letter fell from her hand, she clasped her
fingers tightly across her forhead, and before the
terrified and humane Janet could step forward to
catch her, she fell lifeless on the floor.
CHAPTER X.
THE LETTERTHE BIRTH DAY.
October
had almost expired, Lucy Blakeney
began to count the hours when she should be relieved
from the state of suspense which, notwithstanding
her well regulated mind and subdued feelings was
very painful. She had occasionally heard through
the Ainslie family of Franklin's health and that his
father still remained in a weak and sometimes
deranged
state. Her mind was harassed, she even no
longer took pleasure in visiting Blandford's cottage.
I cannot account for it, Aura, said she one day
to Miss Melville, but though my curiosity was
awakened by the manner in which the old sergeant
commenced his story, yet I cannot summon
resolution
to ask him to tell it me, a certain terror spreads
through my frame, and I wish to hear no more of it
till I can hear it in company with Mr. Franklin.
Alas, and a-well-a-day, replied Aura, laughing,
what a sad thing this tender something is, which
we hardly dare own, and know not how to describe.
Well, I will not deserve to be laughed at, Aura:
for I will act upon principle, and am resolved to
partake and enjoy all the comforts and innocent
pleasures of life that may fall in my path, though
one little thorn should pierce my foot in my
pilgrimage
.
Your foot or your heart, Lucy?
Why my good Aura, I shall strive to keep it as
far from my heart as I can.
Do you remember, Lucy, what day next
Thursday is? asked Mr. Matthews, one morning
as he sat at breakfast with his family.
It is my birth day, sir, is it not?
Even so, my good little girl, for with Mr.
Matthews every thing that was held very dear by
him, was denominated
little
.
Well, continued he, and what shall we do
to celebrate the day? I have no doubt but all the
beaus and misses in the envirous of Southampton,
have long been anticipating splendid doings on the
day when Miss Blakeney obtains her majority.
I mean to have very splendid doings, sir.
Indeed.
Yes
I wonder then, Miss Blakeney, you did not give
my brother and sister intimation of your intent,
said Mrs. Cavendish, that proper preparations
might have been made without the hurry which
must now ensue.
Oh, my dear madam, said Aura, Lucy and I
have been busy these two months past in preparing
for this interesting occasion, and indeed our
invitations
are already sent out, and every one, I do assure
you, accepted.
Very extraordinary conduct, I think, said the
consequential old lady.
I wish you had given a little more time, said
Mrs. Matthews, mildly, but however we will see
what can be done. But what is it to be? a ball and
supper? or a breakfast in fashionable style?
Oh neither, madam, though I hope to make some
dance, and some sing who are not much in the habit
of doing such things.
Mrs. Cavendish had taken a large pinch of snuff,
and having wiped the
poudre tabac
, from her upper
lip with one of the finest coloured silk handkerchiefs,
which together with her elegant snuff box she
deposited
in a fillagree work basket which always stood
beside her, and opened her delicate white cambric
one, and laid it on her lap, was beginning to speak,
when Mr. Matthews said, These girls are only
playing tricks with us, sister. Lucy no more intends
to have a party, than I intend to take a voyage to the
moon.
Don't you be too sure, my dear sir, said Lucy,
laying her hand playfully on his arm. I have really
invited a party of forty to dine here on Thursday
next, and all I have to ask is that you will lend
me the hall, and that Mrs. Matthews will have the
goodness to order John to lay the cloth in a simple
manner for my guests, and permit the cook and
housekeeper for all day on Wednesday to obey my
injunctions.
Well, children, said Mrs. Matthews, I
believe
you must have your way this once. It shall
be, Lucy, as you wish.
But come, Lucy, said Mr. Matthews, let us
somewhat into the secret; I suspect you will want a
little cash to carry your fine plans into effect.
Not a doit, dear sir, till Thursday morning, when
I shall want one hundred pounds, in guineas, half
guineas, crowns and half crowns.
Extravagant baggage, he replied, his fine
venerable
countenance glowing with pleasure. Now
tell us the arrangements of the day.
Oh! they are very simple. You know, my ever
venerated Mr. Matthews, on that day I expect to
read a letter, the contents of which will most
probably
determine the hue of my future fate. She
spoke with solemnity, and a slight convulsive tremor
passed over her intelligent features.
11
If you please, let that letter remain
uninvestigated
till I retire for the night. I would enjoy the
innocent
festivities I have projected for the day,and
now, she continued with more hilarity of manner,
I will tell you my plan. About twelve o'clock I
expect my guests to begin to assemble, they will
consist of a few of the oldest and most respected
poor of your parish, with children and grandchildren.
Aura and myself will receive them in the large
sitting
parlour, when yourself, with whom I shall
deposit my hundred pounds, shall portion it out
amongst them according to your judgment. For you
must be the most proper person to decide upon their
necessities and merits. You have ever been so
liberal in your allowance to me, that having laid by
a little hoard, Aura and myself have provided
garments
for the oldest and most infirm, the youngest
and most desolate, and suitable presents for the rest.
Oh! ho, said Mr. Matthews, so now the
secret is out of the cause of the many jaunts to
Southampton lately, and the long conferences held
in the dressing room, of a morning early, to which
none but a few industrious young women were
admitted
.
Even so, sir, for while we were gratifying our
own whims, it was but just that they should not be
selfish ones; so when Aura and I had cut the
garments
,
we employed those young persons to make
them, so that they might be benefited by forwarding
our scheme, without feeling the weight of obligation,
which I should think was a feeling most repugnant
to the young and active. They have none of them
been let into the secret of the use for which these
garments are designed: but some of them if not all
will partake of our festivities.
Mrs. Cavendish had during this explanation, sat
with her eyes fixed on Miss Blakeney's face, she had
folded and unfolded her cambrick handkerchief
several
times, her eyes twinkled, she hemmed, applied
the before mentioned silk handkerchief to her nose:
and at length reaching her hand across the table she
said in no very firm voice, You are certainly a
most extraordinary young lady, and I begin to think
I have never rightly understood you. Pardon me,
child, I fear I have this morning been both illiberal
and rude.
So well acquainted as I am with Mrs.
Cavendish's
good understanding, and highly cultivated
mind, said Lucy, gracefully taking the extended
hand, it would be next to impossible that I could
suspect her of ever being intentionally either illiberal
or rude. Well, well, replied the old lady, with
one of her most knowing nods, I trust I shall know
you better in future.
On the Wednesday following several good sirloins
of beef were roasted, hams boiled, pies baked, and
on the Thursday morning plumb puddings boiled for
the expected regale. It was scarcely twelve o'clock
when the company began to assemble; the young
brimful of joy, and the old anticipating they hardly
knew what, but all were cheerful and blithe with
the most delightful sensations. Amongst the first
arrived old Alice Lonsdade and her good man,
brought by one of their neighbour's, whom Lucy
had engaged for the purpose, in a chaise; nor were
Thomas, who had now recovered the use of his limbs,
with his good Dame and children, forgotten. While
the family who had excited so warmly Lady Mary
Lumley's romantic enthusiam, were the blithest
among the blithe, in the happy group, that not only
filled the Rector's eating parlour, but partially filled
the benches in the great hall; for Lucy's forty, when
children, grandchildren, and in some cases
great-grandchildren
were collected, amounted to about
sixty. Dishes of common cake were handed round,
with cheese and ale for the men, and wine-sangaree
for the women. Mr. Matthews then with a
discriminating
hand, portioned out the bounty of the
heiress, according to the necessities of all: and many
were that day provided with the means of passing
through the ensuing winter with comfort, who else
must have been pinched, both for fuel and
sustenance
.
At half past two, the tables were plentifully spread,
at which amongst the elder guests, Mr. and Mrs.
Matthews presided, and at that with the younger, sat
Lucy and Aura, while Mrs. Cavendish walked round,
looked at their happy faces, and took her pinch of
snuff with more exhilarated feelings than she had
experienced for years before.
After dinner Lucy and Aura invited the Matrons
to their own apartments which adjoined each other,
where each received a present of clothing adapted to
her age, circumstances and family. The young ones
sported cheerfully in the grounds, the old men
talked
in groups round the hall chimney, where blazed
an old fashioned large and cheerful fire. At six, a
regale of coffee, tea, and simple cakes, with bread
and butter were set forth; and before eight, all had
retired to seek their homes, under the light of a
brilliant full moon.
And how did Lucy feel when all were departed?
She felt as a christian ought to feel, she had cheered
and lightened the hearts of many; she had herself
enjoyed the purest felicity during the whole day,
and she mentally ejaculated as taking the letter from
her guardian she sought her own apartment,
If I have now a bitter cup to drain, let me not
repine. I have much, very much, to be grateful for,
and what right have I to expect to walk over beds
of roses without feeling the briers which surround
the stalks on which those beautiful and fragrant
flowers
blossom.
She entered her chamber, bidding Aura good night
at the door, which closing, she sat down, the letter
in her hand, which though unsealed, she had not
courage to open: at length rallying her spirits she
unfolded the paper and read,
TO MISS LUCY T. BLAKENEY,
To be delivered on the day she attains the age of
21.
From the hour when I closed the eyes of your
beloved, ill fated mother, you, my dear Lucy, have
been the delight and solace of your grandmother and
myself. And your amiable disposition has led us to
hope, that you may in future be the happy inheritress
of the estate and property on which we have lived
above thirty-five years: happy, my child, in
bestowing
11*
comfort on others, and doubly happy in the
enjoyment of reflected joy from grateful hearts.
You are in possession of independence from the
bequest of Captain Blakeney, but you will find by my
will, that it is my wish that not a farthing of that
bequest
,
either principal or interest, should be expended
on you during your minority. The income arising
from your hereditary estate, &c. being amply
sufficient
to clothe, board, and educate you, in the style
of a gentlewoman. You are by law entitled to the
name and arms of Blakeney, but there was a clause
annexed to your godfather's will which gave your
dear grandmother and myself some uneasiness.
It is that which insists that your future husband
should change his own name to that of Blakeney, or
the whole of the original bequest will be forfeited,
and the accumulated interest only be yours.
My lamented wife, in her last hours, Lucy, said
to me, `I wish, love, you may live to see our lovely
child of an age when you may advise her never
to shackle her sensibility by feeling as if she were
obliged to reject the man whom she may love, and
who might make her very happy, because himself
or his friends should object to a change of name. I
myself have such a predilection for family names,
that had it not been for particular circumstances, and
that the name of a female must at some time or other
in all probability be changed, I should never have
consented to our Lucy assuming the name of
Blakeney
.
Should you be called hence before she is of a
proper age to understand and be entrusted with every
necessary communication on the subject of her birth,
and other interesting circumstances, I must intreat
you will be very explicit with her guardians, and
also leave a letter addressed to herself.'
Soon after this conversation, the companion and
friend of my life, the heightener of all my joys, the
consoler of all my sorrows, the only woman I ever
loved, left this transitory sphere for a more blissful
region. From that moment the world, my Lucy, has
appeared a blank. Not even your endearing
cheerfulness
,
your affectionate sympathy, could call me
back to any enjoyment in life, I have endeavoured
several times to nerve my feelings to the
performance
of this task, and have blamed myself for thus
procrastinating it. But from several symptoms of
failure in my mental and bodily vigour, I feel it will
not be long before I follow my regreted partner into
the world of spirits.
I expect to see Mr. Matthews in the course of a
few weeks, I shall then make him the confidant of
many sorrows, which have sunk deep into my heart,
and drank its vital energies, earlier than, perhaps,
time might have impaired them. I intreat, my Lucy,
my last earthly treasure, that in no momentous
concern
of your life you will act without consulting
him, and when you have consulted, abide entirely
by his decision.
As it regards a matrimonial connection, let not
the clause of your godfather's will have any
influence
.
Your own patrimony will yield four hundred
pounds a year; this must half be settled on
yourself
.
The accumulation of the interest on my friend
Blakeney's bequest will be very considerable in
eleven years. This is your own to be settled or
disposed of as yourself may direct. I have, by
insisting on half your patrimony being settled on
yourself previous to the day of marriage, secured to
you the comforts and conveniences of life, as long
as life may be continued; for the rest, I leave you in
the charge of a good and heavenly Protector, who
will never leave those to perish, who rely on his
providence.
There is one thing, my ever dear child, I am very
anxious about, and on which my charge to you will
be very solemn. It is, that you will never marry
any one of the name of M.
Here the stroke of death arrested the hand which
held the pen, and the good old gentleman was found
as already mentioned, dead in his easy chair.
What can I think, how must I act? said Lucy,
as with stunned faculties she still gazed on the open
letter on the table before her. I will determine on
nothing till I know the opinion of my guardian on
the subject: in the mean time I will implore the
guidance and protection of HIM who knoweth best
what is good for his children, and leave the event to
time. So concluding, she folded the letter,
performed
her nightly devotions, and retired to her
bed.
Lieutenant Franklin was now in London, his
father, whose health was still very feeble, had with
his family, taken up their residence in their house
in Portland Place. He had counted the days with
anxiety, till the arrival of Lucy's birth day, after
that, time seemed to have added lead to his pinions,
and every hour and day were as an hundred. At
length he received the following letter from Mr.
Matthews,
TO LIEUTENANT JOHN FRANKLIN.
I have sat down, my dear sir, to fulfil
a most unpleasant task in communicating to you by
the desire of our lovely and esteemed friend, Miss
Blakeney, a copy of her grandfather's letter, which
I inclose, thinking it best to keep the original in my
possession.
You perceive that the old gentleman was by no
means averse to her marrying to please herself though
it might be to the diminution of her fortune. That
there were some unhappy circumstances attending
the birth of Miss Blakeney, I have every reason to
conclude; though, what those circumstances were, I
never could ascertain. For though my respected
old friend frequently promised to impart them to
me, the communication was deferred from time to
time, till with him, poor man, time was no more.
You will perceive that there is some particular
family into which he had strong objections to her
marrying, but the unfinished capital, which I am at
a loss to decide whether meant for an N, and M, or
an A, leads to no direct conclusion. I know he had
a peculiar dislike to a family of the name of Lewis,
the descendants of which in one branch are Mertons,
in another Northalertons. There was a person also
of the name of Allister, who gave him much trouble
by a law suit. But I hardly could think my old
friend was so little of a christian as to let his
prejudice
descend from generation to generation.
However
,
be that as it may, there is nothing in the
unfinished capital, that looks like F. Miss Blakeney
is well, has kept her birth day in a most novel and
splendid manner; I wish you could have seen her
presiding amongst her guests; but I presume it will
not be long before we see you at the Rectory, when
you will hear from every tongueyes, even from
sister Cavendish, her eulogium.
I am, Dear Sir,
Yours, with Esteem,
ALFRED MATTHEWS.
The evening after Mr. Matthews had despatched
this letter he entered the sitting parlour, where his
family were assembled, some at work, some reading,
and Aura Melville, strumming, as she called it, on
the guitar. He took a morocco case from his
waistcoat
pocket, and seated himself by a work table
where Lucy was elaborately plying the needle's art,
without having any definite end for which the work
was designed when completed. He opened the case,
a miniature of a lady set in wrought gold, and
suspended
by a superb chain was taken from it, and
throwing the chain over Lucy's neck, he said,
This, my little girl, should have been a birth day
present, but you were so happy on that day, I thought
you should not have too much satisfaction at once,
it is good and prudent to portion out pleasure by
degrees. If we are too lavish of it, the sense of
enjoyment becomes torpid.
Lucy had taken the picture, it was that of a lovely
female not more than sixteen years old: on the
reverse was a braided lock of brown hair
surmounted
by the initials C. T, in fine seed pearl.
Who is this lovely creature? said Lucy.
Come to the glass, my child, and tell me who it
is like, said Mr. Matthews, leading her to the glass,
and raising a candle near her face. Lucy looked,
and hesitated.
Only, at length she said, only, that it is much
handsomer, and the eyes are blue, I should think.
That it was like yourself, said Mr. Matthews,
leading her to the sofa, where Aura having laid aside
her instrument, was ready to receive her.
It is the portrait of your mother, Lucy! It was
taken, your grandfather informed me, about three
years previous to your birth, and was constantly
worn by your grandmother, till some deeply
afflicting
occurences, to which I am a stranger, induced
her to lay it aside.
Lucy pressed the fair semblance of youth and
innocence to her lips, to her heart, tears rushed from
her eyes, and depositing the portrait in her bosom,
she rested her head on the shoulder of Aura, and
perfect silence for several minutes pervaded the
apartment
.
So here is our friend Franklin! said the good
Rector, a few mornings after, presenting the young
Lieutenant to the busy group, drawn round the fire
side in the breakfast parlour.
Franklin bowed, and with a face half doubting,
half delighted took a chair beside Lucy. She smiled,
blushed, broke off her thread, unthreaded her needle,
threaded it again, and worked most assiduously
without
one single idea of why or wherefore. Asked
when he left London? What was the state of his
father's health? When he last saw Edward Ainslie?
till without being perceived by them, separately and
silently every persen but themselves had left the
room.
Of all scenes to be repeated in narrative, love
scenes are the most sickening, silly, and
uninstructive
.
Suffice it then to say that in an hour after they
found themselves alone, Lucy had resolved to
relinquish
the principal of Blakeney's legacy. Franklin
with intire satisfaction according to the terms of
settling half her paternal inheritance on herself, and
receiving the accumulated interest of eleven years
on twenty thousand pounds, as a fortune to be
disposed
of according as his judgment should direct.
Friendship, love, and harmony, now took up their
residence in the Rectory; the unostentatious though
silently progressing preparations making for the
wedding of Miss Blakeney, furnished occupation for
every female of the family. Even Mrs. Cavendish
relaxed her stern, yet really handsome features into
smiles as she gave her opinion upon some new
purchase, or told to the young persons whom Lucy
chose to employ on this occasion, how such and such
a dress was made and trimmed, when she was some
few years younger.
It was one of Miss Blakeney's eccentricities, that
nothing that could be performed by the industrious
young women, in the immediate vicinity of the
Rectory
,
should be sent for from London; and one
morning when Mrs. Matthews and Mrs. Cavendish
argued that her outward garments might be more
tasteful and fashionable if made in the metropolis,
she replied,
But I am so vain as to think I should not look
any handsomer in them, and I am sure I should not
feel so happy. I know these good young women;
some of them have aged parents to support, some
young brothers and sisters to educate and put in
a way to get their own bread. I am very sensible
that with the assistance of Miss Melville, and our
female domestics, more than two thirds of the work
that is to be done, might be performed without any
additional expense. But it has been a principle
with me, ever since I was capable of reflecting on
the subject, that those who can afford to pay for their
clothes, &c. being made, defraud the industrious of
what is their due, by making those articles
themselves
.
I have also another odd fancy, I will not
always employ those in the highest class of their
profession
,
because having some taste of my own, and not
being very fond of finery, or going to the extreme of
fashion, I can generally give such directions as shall
cause my clothes to be made in a neat becoming
manner, and when I go to town it will be time
enough to purchase, whatever splendid dresses I may
require for making my entrance into the gay world,
so as not to disgrace the family, or impeach the
judgment of Mr. Franklin.
12
A month had flitted by on rapid wings, when just
at the close of a cold, dismal November day, as
Franklin, having dined with the family at the
Rectory
,
was proposing a game of chess, with Mr.
Matthews; a letter was delivered him by a servant,
who said it was brought by one of Sir Robert
Ainslie's grooms, who had ridden post from London,
not stopping for any thing but slight refreshment,
and to change horses.
Lucy watched his countenance as having
apologized
to the company, he eagerly broke the seal and
read it. The colour fled from his cheeks, his lips
quivered, and putting his hand to his forehead, he
faintly articulated,
My poor father! my mother!
Are they ill? Has any thing happened to either
of them? asked Lucy, as pale and agitated as
himself
.
Something very dreadful has befallen them, he
replied, but of what nature, I cannot tell. These
are a few, almost incoherent lines from Edward
Ainslie, requesting I will not lose a moment in
setting
off for London, he will meet me a few miles
from town, and explain what he did not choose to
commit to paper. I shall set off for Southampton
immediately on horseback, and from thence to my
father's house as fast as a chaise and four horses can
carry me.
You will let us hear from you? said Mr.
Matthews
.
As early as the state of affairs will permit, was
the reply.
You know you have friends here who will not
desert you in the day of adversity, said Mrs.
Matthews
,
with one of her most benevolent looks.
The pale lips of Miss Blakeney moved, but no
sound passed them; she held out her cold hand to
Franklin, which having tenderly pressed, and
respectfully
kissed, he hastily said, God bless you
all! and hurried out of the room.
In a moment his horse was heard going at a quick
pace down the avenue, and anxiety and suspense
became the inmates of the bosoms of Lucy and her
sympathizing friends.
CHAPTER X.
MANUVRINGESTABLISHMENT FORMEDCHANGE
OF CIRCUMSTANCES ALTERS CASES.
It
cannot be supposed but that in the length of
time elapsed since Lady Mary Lumley left the
protection
of her friends to trust to the honour of a
profligate, many conjectures had been formed
concerning
her situation, and the treatment she met
with from her husband. All the family at the
Rectory
,
were anxious to hear from her, but how to
direct their inquirers they were entirely at a loss.
Mr. Matthews once or twice, called on Mrs.
Brenton
,
but the old lady could give them no intelligence.
The last letter she received from Theresa, was dated
from Alnwick, and that was above seven months
since; in that she said Sir Stephen and his Lady
talked of making a short trip to the continent, and if
they invited her to accompany them she should
certainly go. The old lady did not express any
uneasiness, concluding they were in France, and as
Theresa never was a very attentive correspondent to
her mother, supposed her time was too much
absorbed
in pleasure to think much about her old mother.
Mrs. Cavendish then wrote to some of Lady
Mary's relations on the mother's side, to inquire if
they had heard from her; but they, offended at her
imprudent conduct, and the marriage connection she
had formed, answered, that They neither knew, nor
wished to know any thing about her. The
uneasiness
of the family was much increased, when a day
or two after Mr. Franklin's departure, a gentleman
lately returned from France, called to deliver letters
to Mr. Matthews, and staying dinner, mentioned
having seen Sir Stephen Haynes in Paris some little
time since.
Was his lady with him? asked Mrs. Cavendish.
There certainly was a lady with him, replied
the gentleman, but I did not understand she was
his wife. I saw her several times, but never in his
company. She was a bold looking woman, of
exceedingly
free manners, and was said to lead a very gay
life.
That was not our poor Mary, whispered Aura
to Miss Blakeney. Lucy shook her head, and the
subject was dropped.
We left this victim of self will, and ill directed
sensibility at a cottage not many miles distant from
Alnwick castle, under the care of Mr. Craftly; but
so ignorant were both Lady Mary and her friend of
the country in which the cottage was situated, that
they would have been unable to direct a servant, had
any been allowed them, to find a post town or village
by which means to transmit a letter to their friends.
But for weeks after the departure of Sir Stephen,
Lady Mary was in no state to write or hardly to
think, being ill with a slow nervous fever, and at
times delirious. Her highly excited state of feeling,
her keen disappointment, added to a degree of self
accusation which her ingenuous mind could not
suppress
,
was more than she could support, and she had
nearly sunk under itperhaps would have done so,
but that Craftly, who though he considered her as
an imprudent young woman, pitied her sufferings
and interested his mother and sister in her behalf.
These truly virtuous, respectable women did not
think that the commission of one fault was sufficient
to banish a human being from society, or excuse in
others the want of humanity or kindness. They
went to the cottage, they hovered over her like
guardian angels, and when in her wanderings she
would call for Lucy, Aura or Mrs. Matthews, they
would one or the other present themselves at her
bedside, soothe her, administer her medicines, talk
of Sir Stephen's return, of her reunion with her
friends, and by degrees brought her back to health
and a comparative degree of comfort.
Miss Brenton, taking her tone from these kind
hearted women, was tender and attentive. Lady
Mary revived, as to external appearance, but her
12*
warm enthusiastic heart had been chilled, the bright
prospects of youth, to her were shrouded, and the
sweet blossoms of hope were crushed forever.
Who and what was Craftly? A man of no mean
capacity, nor bad feelings, who had been brought up
to the profession of the law. He had lost his father
early in life, but that father had secured to his wife
and daughter, who was ten years the senior of her
brother, a decent competency, and a genteel house
in the vicinity of Alnwick. The residue of his
estate and property he left to his son. There was
considerable ready money. Craftly, wished to
taste the pleasures of a London winter; during that
winter, being young and inexperienced, he became
the prey of sharpers and gamesters; and among the
rest became a debtor to Sir Stephen Haynes. His
money was run out, the few and trifling rents he had
to receive had not become due, and the only security
he had to offer was the mortgage of a small cottage
and grounds he held in Northumberland.
When therefore Haynes met Craftly upon his
return from the north with his newly made lovely
bride, it occurred to his unprincipled mind that
he might make him subservient to his views in
getting free from Lady Mary, and enjoying his
intended
tour to the continent in company with a
dissolute
woman, who had persuaded him, that though
married and the mother of two lovely children, her
invincible attachment to him had induced her to
sacrifice all at the shrine of her illicit love.
This woman Sir Stephen Haynes had set up in
his heart as a paragon of perfection; he did not feel
that it was her blandishments that drew him first
from the paths of rectitude; he did not know that
a profligate unprincipled woman, is the bane of
man's peace, both here and hereafter.
Mary Lumley was agreeable in her person,
sportive
in her manners, and easily assailed by flattery.
Her fortune had been represented as more than
treble its value. He sought to obtain that fortune,
but shrunk from proclaiming her as his wife.
Possessed
of her little patrimony, his thoughts reverted
to the woman who had enslaved his youthful mind,
and leaving his confiding victim to what chance or
time might produce, he took his adulterous paramour
with him on his journey to France.
Lady Mary, recovered by the care of her unknown
friends, began to think of living, and when she
discovered
that she was likely to become a mother,
life itself became more endeared to her. Lady
Mary Lumley, however headstrong in her resolves,
however misled by the spirit of romance, and the
flattery of pretended friends, had naturally a good
heart, and an understanding above mediocrity. The
time she had passed in the family of Mr. Matthews
had been of infinite service to her. The principles
and habits of the individuals who formed that family,
were such as had taught her, that the neglect of duty
in others, was no excuse for the same neglect in
ourselves.
I am forsaken, she mentally argued,
deceived
,
plundered of fortune and good name, but
if my misconduct is the cause of a human being
coming into the world, a being dependant on me
for every thing, it is my duty to submit to the evils
I have brought upon myself, and be to the little
innocent, father! mother! all. How we are to be
supported, God alone can tell; but my revered
guardian used to tell me, that our Heavenly Father
would maintain the cause of the orphan, and be the
Judge of the widow. Alas! for me, I am more
desolate
than a widow; my infant, if it ever sees the
light, unless his father be led to do us justice, more
wretched than an orphan.
It may be asked why did she not write to those
friends she now knew how to appreciate. She did
write, but Craftly had received orders to forward
no letters whatever; he had therefore requested his
mother and sister, before he agreed to their
attending
the sick bed of Lady Mary, to give all letters,
whether written by her or Miss Brenton, to him;
alleging as a reason, that he could conveniently
send them to the post office, without trouble to
them.
It may be remembered that Haynes had
represented
Theresa Brenton to Craftly, as an object,
in regard to fortune, worthy of pursuit, and had
intimated
to that lady that Craftly was an
independent
man. A genteel establishment was the aim of
the lady; a little ready money would be very
acceptable
to the gentleman; therefore mutual
civilities
,
condescension, and uniform politeness, was
scrupulously practised between them. He asserted,
that Sir Stephen Haynes said he was not the
husband
of Lady Mary; that she was a thoughtless
romantic girl of fashion, who was so madly in love
with him that she had thrown herself upon his
protection
,
without waiting for those forms which her
friends would have insisted on, and which, he had
no inclination to submit to.
Theresa knew this in part to be true; but she also
knew that the marriage ceremony had passed at
Gretna Green, and that Mary Lumley was in her
own opinion, though perhaps not in the eye of the
law, the wife of Sir Stephen Haynes. But Lady
Mary was now poor; where was the use of her
(Theresa's) irritating Sir Stephen? it would do her
poor misguided friend no good, and might be of
injury
to the plans she had formed for herself. Miss
Brenton then became in externals an entire new
character; she had entirely developed the pure,
unassuming characters of Mrs. Craftly and her
daughter. Brought up in the country, mixing with
but little society, though that little was select; of
plain good understandings, they were urbane in
their manners without being highly polished: and
very pleasant companions without being thought
wits or aiming to appear deeply learned. Of strict
principles both as it regarded religious duty and moral
rectitude; cheerful without levity, and grave
without
affected sanctity; their own minds, actuated by
unsuspicious simplicity, thought no evil of others,
until positive facts obliged them to believe it.
With the son and brother, they had ever lived in
harmony; for he was the idol of both, and they
either did not, or could not perceive a fault in him.
He, on his part, had so much regard for their peace,
as to guard against any of his misconduct reaching
them, or giving them any disturbance.
Theresa Brenton then to this family appeared
every thing that was amiable. She was conciliating
to the Craftlys; would talk most sagely upon
economy, domestic concerns, quiet seclusion, love
of mental improvement; and when the gentleman
was present, would descant on the beauties of her
mother's seat near Southampton, without betraying
that it was only a hired place, and that its chief
beauties consisted in the neat snug appearance of a
small house and the garden surrounding it, and a
view of the Bay from the upper windows. Then
she would pathetically lament poor Lady Mary's
misfortune, speak of her as a young woman of
impetuous
feelings, which had never been kept under
any restraint, and conclude with a sigh,
She fully believes herself Sir Stephen's wife,
and it will be as well not to contradict her; in her
present delicate state of health, it might produce
fatal consequences. Though what is to become of
her I cannot think, for by her not hearing from
her friends I fear they have cast her off. I myself
feel uneasy sometimes at not hearing from my
mother, but elderly persons are not very fond of
writing: so I do not think so much of it as I
otherwise
should.
Lady Mary endeavoured to obtain from Craftly
her husband's address, but he always pretended that
he believed him to be so unsettled that a letter would
have but little chance of finding him.
All letters addressed to any member of Mr.
Matthews'
family were condemned to the flames, or
thrown by in a drawer amongst waste paper; nor was
he more careful of those written by Theresa to her
mother, though to own the truth she did not trouble
him with many. He well knew that to send
intelligence
to Mrs. Brenton was furnishing a direct clue
to the discovery of Lady Mary, and this he had
promised his friend Haynes should not be made in
less than six months after his departure.
Besides, thought Craftly, Theresa might
mention my attentions to her mother, and if I bring
myself to marry the girl I might be plagued from
that quarter about a settlement, and subject myself
to have inquiries made which it may be neither easy
nor convenient to answer.
I have been thinking, my dear Theresa, said
he one evening, as seated in the porch they were
enjoying the full splendor of a harvest moon, I
have been thinking, and wishingindeed it is the
wish also of my mother and sister, they think it
would be for the happiness of all concerned, to unite
our hands, as I trust our hearts are already in unison
with each other; and form our establishment before
the winter commences.
He then proceeded to explain his actual fortune
and his expectations, and made it appear that his
annual
income was above five hundred pounds a year,
but in this he included the cottage, &c. without one
word of the mortgage which Sir Stephen Haynes
still held, though he had agreed to give up the
interest
which might arise from it for eighteen months
to come, if Craftly would oblige him in the manner
we have already seen he did. Finding the lady
silent, the lover then went on to say,
You will have no objection, my dear girl, to
making this cottage our residence for the present.
My mother will undoubtedly give us an invitation
to pass part of the winter with her in Alnwick,
which I do assure you is a very lively and genteel
place, affording many rational and pleasant
amusements
;
the society they mix in, is of the most
respectable class.
I can have no objection to pass a few weeks
or months with Mrs. and Miss Craftly, said
Theresa
,
interrupting him: but as to agreeing to make
this Gothic cottage a place of residence, except for
a few months, in the heat of summer, I can never
agree to it. I expect, at least the first winter after
our marriage, that you will permit me to partake in
your society, the pleasures of either York or London.
I should prefer the latter. Indeed it will be almost
impossible to give my little fortune into your hands
without a journey to the metropolis, we can then
also make a visit to my mother, who I am afraid
must begin to think me very negligent.
Well! thought Craftly, this is
moderation
with a vengeance! A winter in London! I
have had enough of winters in London. I must
persuade
her out of this notion, or there is an end of
the matter. She cannot be rich enough to justify
such a piece of extravagance. Putting on
therefore
one of his most engaging smiles, he replied,
But, my dear Theresa, have you duly
considered
the expense of a London winter, or even a
winter in York. The whole of my yearly income
would not pay our expenses, living in barely decent
style. And though I do not know the amount of
your fortune, yet I will take upon me to say, that
the greater part of it might be run out in a single
winter in London, without enabling either of us to
be considered
somebody
. You are certainly too
well versed in economy not to consider it better
to spend only our income in cutting a good figure
in the respectable town of Alnwick for many
winters
,
than to spend half our fortunes in cutting
no
figure at all
in the great city of London one winter.
Think better of that project, I entreat you, my
Theresa.
There was reason in this. Determined however
not to be too easily thwarted, she made some further
attempts to carry her point; but finding the
gentleman
growing rather cool and distant, during the
several days that she held out, she prudently
yielded
,
and the preparations for the marriage were
commenced
with great alacrity.
CHAPTER XI.
FRUITS OF ERROR.
Lieutenant Franklin
did not meet his friend
Ainslie on the road to London as he had expected.
On his arrival in town, he hastened to Portland
Place. The blinds of his father's splendid mansion
13
were closed, and every thing about it wore an aspect
of gloom. The door was opened by a servant whose
countenance indicated some terrible calamity.
Franklin hastened towards his mother's apartment,
but was met on the stairs by one of his brothers,
who had been summoned home from Eton. From
him he learnt, that his father lay apparently at the
point of death, having ruptured a blood vessel; that
his mother had been by his bedside almost
incessantly
,
since the accident had happened, and that
the whole family were in a state of the greatest
alarm and trepidation.
As he entered the sick chamber, the closed
windows
,
the low whisperings of the attendants, the
odours of medicinal preparations, and most of all,
an occasional stifled sob from one of the children,
who was permitted to be in the apartment for a few
moments, brought home to his bosom the conviction
that he was about to become fatherless. He
approached
the bed. His father lay perfectly
motionless
and silent, with closed eyes, watched by the
partner
of all his sorrows, who bent over him like some
kind angel, with a ministry unremitted and untiring.
An indifferent gazer might have read upon the
marble
forehead and classic features of the patient, noble
and generous feelings, commanding talentsa
promise
of every thing that was excellent in character
and desirable in fortuneall blighted by once
yielding
to the impulse of guilty passion.The wife and
the son saw nothing but the mysterious hand of
Providence
,
visiting with severest affliction one whom
they had ever regarded with reverence and love.
Franklin placed himself near the bed, and
pressing
the hand of his mother, waited in unutterable
suspense the moment when his father should awake.
At length he slowly opened his eyes, and fixing
them on his son, with a faint smile he spoke, in a
low voice, My dear boy, I was this moment
thinking of you. It gives me happiness to
remember
,
how soon you are to be blest with the society
of one you love, and who deserves your affection.
I have not been so tranquil for years, as I am
just now, in this thought. I wish that I could see
her. I think I could read in her features the
promise of your happiness, and then go to my
account in peace.
Franklin pressed his father's hand. The big tears
of mingled love, gratitude and sorrow, coursed down
his cheeks. He could not speak in reply. He saw
by his father's countenance, that it was too late to
comply literally with his request, but in the same
moment, it occurred to him that he could almost
accomplish his wish, by showing him the miniature
of Lucy's mother, which he had playfully taken
from her on the day of his departure, and in his
haste and alarm, at the sudden summons, had
forgotten
to restore.
I have a picture of her mother, said he,
putting
his hand in his bosom, it is a good
resemblance
of herself.
He drew forth the miniature, and held it up
before
his father, who rose up, seized it with a
convulsive
grasp the moment the light fell on the
features
,
and looking upon the initials on the back of it,
shrieked out
It isit is come again to blast my vision in my
last hour!The woman you would marry is
my own daughter!Just Heaven!Oh! that I
could have been spared this!Go, my son! Go to
my private deskyou will there find the record of
your father's shame, and your own fate!
Nature was exhausted by the effort. He fell back
on the bed, supported by his trembling wife, and
in a few moments, the wretched Franklin, the once
gay, gallant, happy Montraville, was no more.
CHAPTER XII.
DISCLOSURES.
The
obsequies of Colonel Franklin, were attended
with the circumstances of pomp and state which his
rank required, and the journals of the day proclaim
ed his patriotism and public worth, while his family
mourned in secret over the ruin caused by his
unbridled
passions.
Closeted with his bosom friend Edward Ainslie,
young Franklin laid before him the manuscript
which he had found by his father's direction. It
had been written in a season of deep remorse, and
its object was evidently to redeem from undeserved
obloquy, the memory of the unfortunate Charlotte
Temple, the mother of Lucy Temple Blakeney.
Probably Colonel Franklin had intended to transmit
it to her friends. Indeed a direction to that effect
was found on a loose paper, in the desk. He took
the whole blame of her ill-fated elopement upon
himself. He disclosed circumstances which he had
discovered after her decease, which proved her
faithfulness
to himself; and lamented in terms of the
deepest
sorrow, that it was in his power to make her no
better reparation for all her love and all her injuries,
than the poor one of thus bearing testimony to her
truth and his own cruelty and injustice. He had
never intended this paper to be seen until after his
decease. He could not bear to make these full
disclosures
and afterwards look upon the countenances
of his children; and he mentioned that the reason,
why he had so readily complied with the wish of
a rich relation of his wife, that he should change his
family name of Montraville for that of Franklin,
was, that under that name he had taken the fatal
step which destroyed his peaceto use his own
forcible expression, he would willingly have
lost all recollection of what he was, and changed not
his name only but himself.
Edward! said the unfortunate youth, when
the reading of this terrible record was finished,
I have disclosed to you the story of my ruined,
blasted hopes. Receive this as the strongest mark
of my friendship and confidence. Go to
her!
he
could not utter the name of Lucy. Tell these
dreadful
truths in such a manner as your own feeling heart
13*
shall direct. She is a christian. This is her great
trial, sent to purify and exalt her soul and fit her
for a brighter sphere of existence. I cannotI dare
not see her again. I cannot even give you for her
any other message than a simple, heartfelt `
God
bless her!
' I have caused myself to be exchanged
into a regiment which is ordered to India, and
to-morrow
I bid farewell to England!
Edward promised implicitly to obey his friend's
directions; and receiving from him the fatal
miniature
,
he took leave of him for that day, and returned
to his father's residence to dispatch a letter to Mr.
Matthews, promising to be with him in a few days,
and bring full intelligence of all that related to these
unfortunate occurrences.
The next day he attended his friend for the last
time, and witnessed the final preparations for his
departure
.
There was a firmness, a sternness of purpose
in Franklin's countenance, which indicated that his
thoughts were fixed on some high and distant object;
and though he spoke not of his future prospects,
Edward who knew the force of his character,
mentally
predicted that his name would be found in the
records of military renown. There was an
impatience
to be gone apparent in some of his movements,
as if he feared to linger a moment on English
ground. But this was inadvertently displayed, and
he took leave of his mother, family and friend, with
that deep emotion, which must ever affect a feeling
heart on such an occasion.
Edward was surprised at one circumstance, which
was that Mrs. Franklin seemed to approve of her
son's purpose to leave the kingdom. He had
expected
to find her very anxious to retain him, as
a protector to herself. But he had not attributed to
that lady all the judgment and firmness which
belonged to her character. He had witnessed her
enduring affection, and her noble example of all the
passive virtues. Her energy and decision was yet
to appear.
When the carriage, which bore his friend to the
place of embarkation, had disappeared, he turned to
the widow and made a most cordial tender of his
services in whatever the most active friendship could
perform for her in her new and trying situation.
He mentioned his purpose of going to Hampshire,
and offered to return and await her commands as soon
as the purpose of his journey was accomplished. This
friendly offer was very gratefully acknowledged, but
the tender of his services in the city was declined.
It was not her purpose, she said, to remain in
London
;
but should any circumstances occur which
would render it necessary to avail herself of his
kind offer, she should not fail to do it, in virtue of
the claim which his friendship for her son gave her.
At any rate he should be apprized of the future
movements of the family by some one of its
members
.
Satisfied with this arrangement, Ainslie retired.
CHAPTER XIII.
AN ARRIVAL.
It
may well be supposed that the family at the
Rectory were in a state of great anxiety after the
departure of Franklin. The air of mystery which
attended his hasty summons to town, served to
increase their distress. Lucy struggled, severely but
vainly, to preserve an appearance of composure.
Much of her time was spent in the retirement of
her chamber, and when she was with the family and
apparently deriving a temporary relief from her
sorrows
by joining in the usual occupations of the busy
little circle, a sigh would escape from her in spite of
all her efforts to preserve an appearance of calmness.
It seemed to her that a known calamity, however
terrible and irremediable in its nature, would have
been much more easy to be borne than this state of
suspense. Alas! she was too soon to be undeceived
on this point.
The third day brought a hasty letter from Ainslie
to Mr. Matthews, simply stating the sudden demise
of Colonel Franklin without any mention of the
attending circumstances. This was a relief; a
melancholy
one indeed; but still, Lucy felt it as a relief,
because it seemed to set some bounds to her
apprehensions
.
It seemed natural too, that Ainslie should
be employed to write at such a moment. The
sudden
affliction might have rendered Franklin
incapable
of the effort. Lucy now awaited the result with
comparative tranquillity.
But the second letter of Edward, written after the
disclosure made by his friend, which spoke of
painful
and peculiarly unfortunate circumstances which
he would explain on his arrival, threw her into a
new state of suspense. Here was more mystery.
The first letter which summoned Franklin away had
appeared to be unnecessarily dark and doubtful. The
last renewed all the wretched Lucy's doubts and fears.
On the second day after the receipt of this letter,
Lucy was sitting alone by the parlour fire. It was
late in the afternoon, Mr. Matthews and Aura were
absent administering to the wants of the poor, and
distributing clothing to the destitute, in anticipation
of the approaching inclement season. Mrs.
Matthews
and her sister were busied about their
household
affairs. Lucy was musing on the memory of
past joys and painfully endeavouring to conjecture
the reason of Franklin's mysterious silence; when
the door opened and Edward Ainslie stood before
her, haggard and weary with his journey, and
evidently
suffering under mental perplexity and distress.
At that moment he would have given the world for
the relief of Mr. Matthews' presence. He felt as
though possessed of some guilty secret, and his eye
was instantly averted when he met her searching
glance. He had hoped to encounter some other
member of the family first and instantly felt his
mistake in not having sent for Mr. Matthews to
meet him elsewhere. But retreat was now
impossible
.
He felt that he must stand and answer.
Lucy had advanced and presented her hand as
usual, but with such a look of distressful inquiry as
went to his inmost soul. With an old and tried
friend like Ainslie, ceremony was out of the question.
Where is
Franklin?
Is he well? Is he safe?
He is well. Be composed, Lucy. Do not look
so distressed. Ainslie knew not what to say. Is
he well! Then whyOh why are you alone,
Edward?
There are certain painful circumstances, which
have prevented his accompanying me. You shall
know them
but
Oh tell, I intreat you, tell me all. I have borne
this terrible suspense long enough. Any thing will
be preferable to what I now suffer. I have firmness
to bear the worst certainty, but I have not patience
to endure these doubts. If he is lost to me, say so,
I charge you.
There was a vehemence, a solemnity in her
manner
,
an eagerness in her look, a deep pathos in her
voice, which Edward could no longer withstand.
He trusted to the strength of her character and
determined to disclose the worst. With averted
eyes and a low, and hardly audible voice he replied,
Alas! he is indeed, lost to you!
She did not shriek nor faint, nor fall into
convulsions
,
but placing her hand upon her brow, reclined
against the mantel piece a moment, and then left the
apartment.
Ainslie lost no time in finding Mrs. Matthews,
and apprizing her of what had passed and that lady
instantly followed her young friend to her apartment.
She had over-estimated her own strength. The
sufferings
of this last week had reduced her almost to
exhaustion and this stroke completed the
prostration
of her system. A violent fever was the
consequence
,
and for several days, her life was despaired
of. The distress of Ainslie during this period may
be imagined.
CHAPTER XIV.
ACTIVE BENEVOLENCE, THE BEST REMEDY FOR
AFFLICTION
.
On
Ainslie's communicating to Mr. Matthews the
circumstances which he had learnt from Franklin,
and bitterly lamenting his precipitate disclosure of
them to Lucy, that good man appeared anxious to
alleviate his unavailing regret and to bring forward
every palliation for what, at the worst, was no more
than an error in judgment. He could not permit his
young friend to consider himself responsible for the
consequences, since the stroke could not have been
averted and could scarcely have been made to descend
more gently upon the heart of the devoted girl.
A further disclosure was yet to take place, and
never in the whole course of his ministration among
the wounded spirits, that had required his care and
kindness, had this worthy pastor been more severely
tried than on this occasion. He meditated,
communed
with his friends, sought for Divine assistance
in prayer, and when at last the returning health of
his tender charge rendered it not only advisable but
necessary that she should know the whole, he came
to the trial with fear and trembling.
What was his joy to find that she received the
disclosure which he had so much dreaded to make,
not with resignation merely, but with satisfaction.
It brought a balm to her wounded spirit, to know
that she had not been voluntarily abandonedthat
the man on whom she had placed her affections had
yielded to a stern necessity, a terrible fate, in
quitting
her without even a last farewell. She approved
his conduct. She regarded him as devoted to his
country, herself as set apart for the holy cause of
humanity; and in accordance with this sentiment,
she resolved to pass the remainder of her life in
ministering to the distressed, and promoting the
happiness of her friends.
Nor did she delay the commencement of this
pious undertaking. Aided by her revered friend
the Pastor, she entered upon her schemes of active
benevolence with an alacrity which, while it
surprised
those who were not intimately acquainted
with her character, and justified the exalted esteem
of her friends, served effectually to divert her mind
from harrowing recollections and useless regrets.
Among the earliest of her plans for ameliorating
the condition of the poor was the founding of a little
seminary for the education of female children. She
chose a pleasant spot near the Rectory, a quiet little
nook, bosomed among the wooded hills and
commanding
a view of the village and a wide expanse
of soft meadow scenery; and there she caused to be
erected a neat little building, a specimen, one might
almost say, a model of Ionic architecture. Its chaste
white pillars and modest walls peeping through the
surrounding elms, were just visible from her own
window, and many were the tranquil and
comparatively
happy moments which she spent, sitting by
that window and planning in her own mind the
internal arrangement and economy of the little
establishment
.
She had it divided into several apartments and
placed an intelligent and deserving young woman in
each, to superintend the different parts of education
which were to be taught. In one, the most
useful
kinds of needlework, in another, the common
branches of instruction in schools, and in another
the pinciples of morality, and the plainest truths and
precepts of religion; while, over all these, there was
a sort of High School, to which a few only were
promoted who gave evidence of that degree of talent
and probity which would fit them for extended
usefulness
.
These, under the instruction of the
preceptress
of the whole establishment, were to receive
a more finished education than the rest.
Into every part of the arrangement of these
matters
Lucy entered with an interest which surprized
herself. She delighted in learning the natural bent
and disposition of the young pupils, and would spend
whole hours in conversing with them, listening with
a kind interest to their artless answers and opinions,
and often discovering, or supposing that she
discovered
in them the elements of taste and fancy or
the germe of acute reasoning or strongly inventive
power.
14
But it was in developing their affections and moral
capabilities that she chiefly delighted. There was a
field of exertion in which the example of the
patroness
was of infinite value to the instructers. Her
own education, her knowledge of human character
and of nature, her cultivated and refined moral taste,
and, above all, the healing and religious light, which
her admirable submission to the trying hand of
Providence
had shed over the world and all its concerns,
as they appeared to her view,all these things
served
to fit her for this species of ministry to the minds
and hearts of these young persons.
In these pursuits it is hardly necessary to say that
she found a tranquillity and satisfaction which the
splendid awards of fortune and fame can never
impart
.
CHAPTER XV.
CHURCH AND STATE.
Edward Ainslie
had finished his studies at the
University, where he had so distinguished himself
as to afford the most favourable anticipations of his
future success. He was in some doubt as to the
profession which he should embrace. Inclination
prompted him to devote himself to the church. His
father was anxious that he should become a political
character; probably being somewhat influenced by
an offer, which he had had from one of the ministry,
of a diplomatic appointment for his son.
This interesting subject was under consideration
at the very time when the events, which we have
just been recording, transpired. Edward had
returned
to London after witnessing the perfect recovery
of Lucy, and the discussions concerning his future
career were renewed with considerable interest.
On the evening after his return, he was sitting in
the parlour of his father's splendid mansion. All
the family except his father and himself had retired.
They lingered a few moments to confer on the old
subject.
Well, Edward, said his father, I hope you
are ready now to oblige our friends in a certain
quarter, and strengthen the hands of government.
Indeed, sir, my late visit to the country, has
served rather to increase my predilection for the life
of a country parson.
My Lord Courtly says it is a thousand pities
your talents should be so thrown away; and though
I should not regard the thing in that light, yet
I think that your country has some claims upon
you. Let the livings of the church be given to the
thousands who are unfit for, or unable to attain the
promotion that is offered to you. If you accept a
living, it is ten to one you disappoint some equally
worthy expectant.
Perhaps I shall do the same if I accept this
diplomatic appointment.
Little danger of that, I fancy, when the
appointment
is so freely offered youwhen in fact you are
solicited to accept it. Let me tell you, Edward, you
know not how splendid a career you may be refusing
to enter upon.
I fear, my dear father, that you have not duly
considered the cares and anxieties, of political life.
It is a constant turmoil and struggle for distinction.
All the sterner feelings of our nature are brought
into action. All the generous emotions and amiable
weaknesses of humanity are regarded as fatal to one's
success. A blunder in state affairs is considered
worse than a crime.
I think there is no profession, said the
Baronet
,
in which a crime is not more fatal to success,
in the long run, than a blunder. However, we are
wandering from the subject. In one word, Edward,
I think that you may carry all your strict moral
principles and your high and generous sense of
honour into public life, without in the least
endangering
your success.
What you say may be strictly true, sir, but I
have feelings and partialities which cannot fail to
prove a hindrance. I shall sigh for seclusion and
domestic enjoyment amidst the splendour of foreign
courts, and never pen a dispatch to be sent to old
England, without longing to see its fair prospects of
green fields and smiling cottages. I love to
converse
with nature in her still retreats and if I must
mingle with my fellow men, let it not be in the vain
strife for power and distinction; but rather in the
delightful intercourse of social life, or in the more
interesting relation of one who cares for their eternal
welfare. If I were rich, the character I should most
wish to figure in, would be that of a useful,
benevolent
and religious country gentleman, as the advice
and instruction, which I could thus impart, would not
arise simply from official duty and might be rendered
doubly efficient by acts of benevolence. Since that
may not be, I am content with the humbler office of
a country parson.
At this period of the conversation a servent
entered
with a letter directed to the Baronet, saying that
it had been brought by an express. He opened it
and hastily running it over, exclaimed,
Well, my boy, you can have your wish now.
See there! handing him the open letter.
It was from the executor of a distant relation who
had taken a fancy to Edward in his childhood, and
had now bequeathed him the whole of his large
estate, situated in the North of England.
Astonishment and gratitude to the Divine
Disposer
of events were visible in the countenance of
the youth as he silently lifted up his eyes in
thanksgiving
.
After a few minutes pause, his father said, Well,
you will visit your property immediately, of course?
Yes sir; but I wish to visit Hampshire for a few
days before I set off for the North. And so saying,
he bade his father good night and retired.
14*
CHAPTER XVI.
AN ENGAGEMENT.
Before
leaving London, Ainslie called at the late
residence of Mrs. Franklin, and was surprised to
find the house in other hands. On making further
inquiries of his father, he learnt that she had
embarked
for New York with the whole of her family.
On reflection he was satisfied that this was the most
natural and proper course for her. America was
the land of her nativity, and the scene of all the
happiness she had enjoyed in early life. England,
the country where she had known nothing but
misfortune
and trial. Her young sons, too, would be able
to figure with great advantage in the new country
and its existing friendly relations, with that to which
her oldest son owed allegiance, prevented her feeling
any uneasiness on the score of his present
employment
in the India service. Edward's father also
informed him that Mrs. Franklin's affairs in England
were intrusted to the most responsible agents.
Being satisfied that there was nothing further
which friendship required of him in that quarter he
set out for Hampshire with rather different feelings
from those which oppressed him, on his last visit
there.
We will not attempt to analyze his feelings at this
time; but rather follow him to the Rectory, whither
he hastened after a half hour spent at his father's
seat. On entering the parlour, he found Mrs.
Matthews
and Mrs. Cavendish, and learnt from them that
the young ladies were gone to visit Lucy's favourite
school.
He determined to take a short cut to this place;
and accordingly strolled along a shaded pathway
which led from the garden towards the spot. The
sun was just approaching the horizon and shed a
rich splendour over a pile of massy clouds which
reposed in the west. As he passed rapidly along a
turn in the path revealed to him the solitary figure
of Aura Melville, in strong relief against the western
sky as she stood on the edge of a bank and gazed
upon the last footsteps of the retiring sun. He
approached unobserved, and just as he was on the
point of speaking, heard her say in a low voice, as
though thinking aloud,
How beautiful! How much more beautiful it
would be, if a certain friend were with me to
pronounce
it so!
Laying his hand gently upon her arm, he
murmured
in the same soliloquizing tone, How happy
should I be If I might flatter myself that I were
that friend!
She turned and the orient blush of quick
surprize
,
gave an animation to her features which made
her lover own to himself that he had never seen her
half so lovely.
We have already hinted at Aura's partiality for
Edward and when we apprize the reader that he
had long loved her with a respectful and devoted
attachment, which he had only been prevented from
declaring by his dependent situation and uncertainty
with regard to his pursuits in life, it will readily be
supposed that they were not many minutes after this
in coming to a perfect understanding.
With lingering steps and many a pause, they
turned towards the Rectory long after the shadows
of twilight had begun to fall. The rapture of those
moments, the ardent expressions of the youth, the
half uttered confessions, the timid glances and
averted
looks of the maiden, and the intervals of silence
silence full of that happiness which is never known
but onceall these must be imagined by the reader.
On their arrival at the Rectory they found that
Lucy, who had been left at the school by Aura, had
returned by the more frequented road, and the family
were waiting their coming, while the smoking tea
urn sent forth its bubbling invitation to the most
cheerful, if not the most sumptuous of all
entertainments
.
CHAPTER XVII.
TEA TABLE CONVERSATION.
Well
, Edward, said the good Rector, as he
slowly sipped his favourite beverage, this is an
unexpected pleasure. I had supposed that the wishes
of your father and the rhetoric of the minister had
prevailed over your philosophical resolutions and
that you were already half way to Saint Petersburg.
Perhaps you are only come to pay us a farewell visit,
and are soon to set off for the North.
Indeed, sir, replied Ainslie, I am soon to
set off for the North, but shall hardly reach the
court of the Czars this winter.
To Berlin, perhaps.
Too far, sir.
Peradventure to Copenhagen.
Hardly so far, sir, as the `Land o' cakes an
brither Scots.' I am to sojourn for the next few
weeks among the lakes and hills of Cumberland.
Cumberland! exclaimed three or four voices
at once.
For what purpose can you be going to
Cumberland
,
said Lucy Blakeney, I never heard of any
court in that quarter except that of queen Mab.
I am going to look after a little property there.
I never heard your father say that he owned
any estates in Cumberland, said the Rector.
But my great uncle Barsteck did. You remember
the old gentleman who used to visit my father and
take me with him, in all his strolls about the pleasant
hills and meadows here. He has long been declining
in health and the letter which brought us the
melancholy
intelligence of his decease brought also the
information that he has remembered his old favourite.
I could have wished to be enriched by almost any
other event than the loss of so good a friend.
The remembrance of his relative's early kindness
came over him with such force at this moment that
he rose and turned away to the window and it was
some minutes before he was sufficiently composed to
resume the conversation, in whsch he informed his
friends that he had given up all thoughts of public
life and was resolved to devote himself to more
congenial pursuits amidst the romantick scenery of
the lake country.
It may readily be supposed that this determination
was highly approved by the worthy pastor and that
in the private interview, which he had with Edward,
the next day, it had no small influence in procuring
his approbation of the suit which he then preferred
for the hand of his fair ward.
After a few delightful days spent in the society of
his friends at the Rectory, Edward set forward on
his journey to the North.
CHAPTER XVIII.
AN ADVENTURE.
Edward's
estate was in the neighbourhood of
the romantick vale of Keswick. The mansion house
lately inhabited by his uncle, was an old fashioned
but comfortable house situated on the southern
declivity
of the mountain Skiddaw, with a beautiful
garden and extensive but uneven grounds, laid out in
a style entirely suited to the surrounding scenery.
The view from the balcony, in front of the house,
was one of singular beauty and sublimity. A long
valley stretched away to the south disclosing in the
distance the still glassy surface of Derwent-water
and terminated by the bold and fantastic mountains
of Borrowdale. On the east the lofty steeps of
Wallow-crag and Lodore seemed to pierce the very
heavens, whilst the towering heights of Newland
bounded the view on the West, displaying the
picturesque
varieties of mountain foliage and rocks.
The cottages and farm houses of his tenants were
scattered about in such points of view, as to afford
a pleasing sort of embellishment to the landscape.
Many of them were constructed of rough unhewn
stone, and roofed with thick slates, and both the
coverings and sides of the houses were not
unfrequently
overgrown with lichens and mosses as well
as surrounded with larches and sycamores. Edward
made it his first business, on his arrival, to visit his
tenantry and he found no little pleasure in
studying
the characters of these humble minded people,
whose residence amongst these sequestered mountain
regions had preserved their primitive manners from
the tide of refinement and corruption which had
swept over less fortunate portions of the country.
As he was taking his customary ride on
horseback
one afternoon, he arrived at a part of his estate
remote from the mansion house, and where he had
not before been, when he was struck with the
picturesque
appearance of one of the stone cottages
which we have mentioned above.
It was of a very irregular shape and seemed to
have received additions and improvements from
several generations of its occupants.
The orchard too had its trees of all ages, and
one craggy looking apple tree, which stood before
the door, seemed by its accumulation of moss, and
its frequently protruded dry branches, to be coeval
with the house itself. There was a little garden
with its shed full of bee hives, and its narrow beds
of herbs and borders of flowers, and a small but
noisy rill, that came dashing down from the rocks in
the rear of the cottage, and sent a smile of verdure
and a fairy shout of melody over the whole scene.
Edward alighted and entered the cottage, where
he was received with a hearty welcome. The
farmer himself was away among the hills; but the
good dame was main glad to see his honour, and
hoped his honour was coming to live among them,
as his worship's honour that was dead and gone had
always done.
He assured her that such was his intention.
I am glad your honour has come here this
afternoon
,
she proceeded, for more reasons than one.
Your honour must know there is a poor distressed
young creature in the other room, who wandered
here yesterday after a weary long journey. She is
come of gentle blood, and talks of her relations, who
seem to be all lords and ladies. But sure enough the
poor thing is quite beside herself, and a woful sight
she was, when she came to our door yesterday, with
nothing in the world but an open work straw bonnet
on her head, and a thin shawl over her shoulders,
poor soul, in such a biting cold day. Would not
your honour please to be so good as just to speak a
kind word to her? I'm thinking she's come from
the South, and would be cheered at the sight of one
from her own part of the country, and of her own
degree too.
It will be readily supposed that Edward expressed
a desire to see her, and he was accordingly
conducted
from the neat sitting room, into which he had
first been invited, into a small back room, where
to his no small astonishment he saw, seated in an
easy chair by the fire, and attended by a little girl,
the unfortunate Lady Mary, the wife of Sir Stephen
Haynes.
Her attire consisted of a soiled travelling dress,
which had once been rich and showyher
countenance
,
though thin and wasted, was flushed and
feverish
,
and there was a wildness in her eyes which
told the saddest tale of all, that not only was the
wretched lady forsaken by friends and fortune, but
at least partially deprived of the blessed light of
reason.
She started at the sight of Edward, and exclaimed,
Ha! so you have come at last. Well, there, I
have been crying here all this livelong morning!
My husband the Duke is to be beheaded on Tower
Hill to-morrow morning for high treason! But,
said she, grasping Edward's arm, and whispering
vehemently in his ear, I came within an ace of
being queen, for all that.
Then, too, she continued, weeping bitterly,
they have imprisoned me here, and the constable
of the castle has taken away my jewels, and sent
away my waiting maid, and left me nobody but this
simple maiden here to attend upon me. I could
have forgiven them all this but they have taken
away my child, my pretty boy, with his bright eyes
and his golden locks. Oh, why do they let me live
15
any longer! And she wrung her hands as one not
to be comforted.
Poor creature! whispered the good woman of
the house, she has not been so raving before.
I am acquainted with the unfortunate lady,
replied Edward, in a low voice, but she does not
seem to know me.
Know you! shrieked Lady Mary, catching
his last words, Yes I do know you, Edward
Ainslie
,
and I know, too, what you are come here for.
You have come to preach to me on the folly of
ambition
to
upbraid me for deserting my friends and
protectors. But you may spare yourself the trouble.
I shall answer for all to-morrow. I will die with
my husband.
She said this with great energy, and then, after
pausing a moment and looking thoughtfully on the
floor, she burst into tears again, exclaiming, But
my poor boy! what will become of him. I pray
Heaven they may not destroy him. Surely he has
done no injury to the state. If the king could look
upon his innocent little face, surely he would spare
him.
Edward, perceiving that his presence could be of
no service to her, left the apartment and directed
that every attention should be paid to her, and
promised
ample remuneration to the family for their
trouble. Then hastily mounting his horse, he rode
to the nearest medical attendant, whom he
despatched
to the cottage before he returned home.
CHAPTER XIX.
THE CONSEQUENCES OF IMPRUDENCE.
For
several days after the occurrence which we
have described in the last chapter, Lady Mary
continued
in a high fever, and the physician gave little
hopes of her recovery. Edward visited the cottage
every day to inquire after her, and was at length
happy to learn, that by the unremitted kindness
and care of the worthy family, she was safely past
the crisis of her disorder; that her reason was
restored
,
but her weakness was such, that she had not
been permitted to attempt giving any account of the
manner in which she came into the miserable state
in which she was found.
She was assured that she was under the care of
a friend who had known her in early life, and would
visit her as soon as her strength would permit.
Satisfied
with this assurance, she recovered rapidly,
and, in a month from the time of Edward's first
visit to the cottage, was able to sit up a great part of
the day, and to receive a visit from him.
The interview, as may readily be supposed, was
an affecting one to both parties. Poor Lady Mary
seemed to be throughly humbled by misfortune,
and was desirous of nothing so much as to see her
early friends, and receive their pardon for her
unworthy
conduct in deserting them. Edward assured
her that their affection for her was the same as ever;
that they had regarded her as misled by designing
and artful persons; and that nothing would afford
them such heartfelt pleasure, as to welcome her
once more to their hospitable home.
Thus soothed and encouraged, she informed him
of the events which we have already narrated
concerning
her elopement, and the subsequent desertion
of her husband. She proceeded to say that she had
lost her child, a beautiful boy, born at the Gothic
cottage of which we have so frequently spoken;
that after the marriage of Craftly and Theresa,
which out of regard to that young lady's taste was
celebrated with considerable parade, she had
continued
to reside with them in the cottage, in a state
of indescribable wretchedness from the neglect of
her husband.
She said, that one day when the rest of the family
were out on an afternoon visit, she went into one of
the chambers to look for a book; which, Theresa
had told her as she went out, might be found in a
drawer there. She pulled out one drawer of the
bureau after another in vain, till she came to the
lower one, which came out with considerable
difficulty
.
When, at last, she succeeded in drawing it
out, what was her astonishment, to find a great part
of the letters which she had written to her husband
and friends, tumbled into it, after being broken open?
There were a great many more letters, and some
among them directed to Craftly, in her husband's
hand writing.
Convinced that she was suffering by some vile
conspiracy, she felt herself justified in taking the
whole to her room, after first closing the drawer to
avoid a speedy discovery.
Besides her own and Sir Stephen's letters, there
were several of Theresa's to her mother. Before
the family returned, Lady Mary had read through
the greater part of them, and notwithstanding the
bewildering and oppressive emotions which impeded
her progress and distracted her mind, she was able
to make out pretty clearly what her situation was.
Her husband was living in Paris, immersed in
dissipation. Craftly had been instructed by him,
and was repeatedly charged in the letters, to suffer
no communication between her and her friends, and,
what shocked the unfortunate lady most of all and
deprived her of recollection for some moments, was
a determination expressed in one of the letters never
to see her again, accompanied with the declaration,
that although she supposed herself so, she was not
really his wife.
After recovering from her fainting fit, she hurried
through the remainder of the letters, with many
tears and many prayers to Heaven for support.
Never in my life, said she, did I pass an
afternoon of such complete and thorough
wretchedness
.
I thought myself lost beyond all hope.
Surrounded
with enemies, and without a single
protector
or friend. Before the family returned, I restored
a greater part of the letters to the drawer, and when
desired to join them at tea, I sent an excuse, and was
glad to be left neglected and undisturbed in my
room until the next morning.
15*
During this time I had considered all the
circumstances
of my situation. It was apparent from
the suppression of Theresa's letters, that she had not
from the first been a full participator in the plot
against me. Yet it was not possible for me to give
her my confidence, now that she had become the
wife of Craftly, who was the chief instrument of the
conspiracy. The mother and sister of this hypocrite
were so fully persuaded of his honour, that they
would have considered me a maniac or a
calumniator
,
if I had disclosed the truth to them. I had found
out by the letters that Craftly was paid for my
support by my husband, who relinquished the
interest
of a mortgage on Craftly's estate as payment.
This I regarded as a tacit acknowledgment that
I was his wife. But the evidence of Theresa,
which I supposed could be drawn from her at
some future time by my friends, I considered of
still greater value.
I had no reason to fear that I should be left in
absolute want, or that I should be treated with open
unkindness by any of the family. But it was
dreadful
to me to know, that I was living under the roof
of a man who had conspired to deprive me of every
thing that is valuable in life. I could not look upon
him without a secret shudder running through my
frame. After revolving the circumstances of my
situation for several days, during which I with
difficulty
preserved an outward appearance of
composure
,
I at length came to the resolution to seek
shelter with Mr. Matthews, and endeavour to
recover
the favour of my relations.
But how to effect my escape, with any prospect
of ever reaching my friends, was a difficult question.
I had no money nor jewels of any considerable value;
but there were a few valuable laces which I might
dispose of for enough to defray my travelling
expenses
.
I accordingly packed them up with great
care, and learning that there was to be a fair in the
neighbourhood, I determined to dispose of them
there. On the morning of the fair, I informed the
family that I intended to take a walk, and spend
the day in visiting the cottages in our
neighbourhood
;
I hope the deception will be forgiven me.
I put on my travelling dress, concealed my treasure,
and set forward, with mingled emotions of gladness
and apprehension. I sold the laces without
difficulty
,
though for considerably less than their value,
and I have reason to believe that I was mistaken for
one of those persons who gain a subsistence by
smuggling
articles of this kind from the continent. This
however was a trifling consideration, I could have
consented to pass for a gypsey or a fortune teller
in order to escape from my persecutors.
My next object was to secure a passage in the
mail coach, which went South. Here was a greater
trial of my courage; since this exposure was a
continued
one, while my other was but momentary. I
played my part however as confidently as I could,
and although my unprotected state exposed me to
suspicions which the innkeeper, his wife and even
the servants were at no great pains to conceal, yet I
was enabled to bear up against it all, without a tear,
and arrived at the end of the first stage without
any accident.
The fatigues of the last two days, however,
were so great, that I was nearly overcome when we
arrived at the inn which was at the termination of
this stage, and I retired to a room apart, as soon as we
arrived. I observed a newspaper lying in the window
seat, and after refreshing myself with a cup of tea,
I took it up, half hoping to see the name of some
friend in its columns. Judge of my horror on
reading
the fatal record of my husband's death. He
had fallen in a duel in Paris. I had loved him,
oh too well!
Here Lady Mary became too much affected to
proceed with her narrative. Indeed she had little
more to relate; for the shock had proved too great
for her reason, and from that moment she
recollected
little more than that she had wandered from
village to village, pitied and relieved by some and
derided by others, until she found herself in her
present asylum, restored to perfect recollection by
the care of the good people around her.
Edward had listened to her narrative with the
deepest interest and compassion, and assured her of
the protection and support of her
friends
, whatever
might be the determination of her relations. He
gave directions for her further accommodation at
the cottage during her convalescence, and it was
arranged
that as soon as her strength would permit,
she should take up her residence at his own house.
Having been delayed only by his desire to learn
all that related to her, and to provide for her
comfort
,
Edward set off for the South as soon as these
arrangements had been completed, leaving Lady
Mary under the care of the worthy family at the
cottage.
CHAPTER XIX.
AN OLD FASHIONED WEDDING.
The
time would fail us to enumerate the
multiplied
works of charity in which Lucy Blakeney
engaged
herself. She was not content with
occasionally
visiting the poor and administering to their
more urgent wants; but she made the true economy
of benevolence her study. Her knowledge, her
taste, her wealth, were all rendered subservient to
the great cause. Without officiously intermeddling
with the charities of others, she became a bright
example
to them. Her well timed assistance was a
stimulus and an encouragement to the industrious
poor, and her silent and steady perseverance was a
strong appeal to the better feelings of the rich. She
received the blessing of him that was ready to perish,
and the unheard praise and unsolicited imitation of
those who had abundance of wealth and influence.
As the nuptials of her friend Aura Melville
approached
,
her attention was directed to the proper
mode of honouring that event, and at the same time
rendering it memorable among those who had long
regarded both these young persons as the joint
guardians
of their happiness. Mr. and Mrs. Matthews
and Mrs. Cavendish too, were all for having the
marriage celebrated after the fashion of the good old
times when the poor not only looked up to the
gentry for protection and friendship, but took a
lively interest in their domestic affairs, were
depressed
at their misfortunes, and proud and happy in the
fame and happiness of their patrons.
Nor was Edward Ainslie backward in promoting
this design. Accordingly the preparations for the
marriage were made with a view to interest and
gratify rather than to dazzle the guests. The bridal
array was rather plain than sumptuous, the carriages
and horses of Edward and his family, were decked
with ribbons, and the church ornamented with
flowers
and evergreens, prepared by the pupils of Lucy's
establishment, who also walked in procession and
had their dance upon the green, to the music of
the pipe and tabor. The villagers crowded the
church to witness the ceremony, and repaired to
the Rectory to partake of the bride cake, while the
poor who had been invited to celebrate Lucy's birth
day, found an entertainment not less substantial and
exhilarating than the former one, prepared for them
at her friend's wedding.
A long summer's day was spent in the festivities of
this happy occasion, and when late in the evening
the full moon was seen rising behind the church
tower and shedding his quiet lustre over hill and
valley, streamlet and grove, the music was still
sounding, and the merry laugh of the light hearted
guests was heard in parlour and hall.
None seemed to enjoy the day more deeply and
feelingly than Lucy. She had learned the great
secret of woman's happiness, to enjoy the happiness
of others. Selfish gratification was no concern of
hers. She had entered into the previous
arrangements
with all her heart, and as her object had been
not to lay her friends under heavy obligations and
astonish the guests by show and parade, but to
promote
the real and heartfelt pleasure of all concerned,
she succeeded; and none derived more satisfaction
from partaking of this festival of true joy than she
did from its preparation.
When, on the following morning, Edward and
his bride set off for the North, she with the rest of
the family bade them a tender adieu, and returned
to her usual benevolent occupations with that
tranquil
and calm spirit, that firm reliance on the
Righteous
Disposer of all things, which, in every situation
of life, is indeed the pearl of inestimable value.
CONCLUSION.
Several
years rolled away after the event
recorded
in the last chapter, without affording any
thing worthy the attention of the reader. The
persons to whom our narrative relates, were enjoying
that calm happiness, which as has frequently been
remarked, affords so little matter for history. We
must accordingly conclude the story with the
incidents
of a somewhat later period.
It was the season of the Christmas holidays.
Edward and his blooming wife with their two lovely
children, were on a visit to his father, and had come
to pass an evening at the Rectory. Lady Mary too
was there. She had recovered from the wreck of
her husband's property enough to support her
genteelly
,
and had found an asylum with her old
preceptor
and guide, in the only place where she had
ever enjoyed any thing like solid happiness.
The Rector, now rapidly declining into the vale
of years, afforded a picture of all that is venerable
in goodness; his lady retained her placid and
amiable
virtues, although her activity was gone; and
the worthy Mrs. Cavendish, still stately in her
carriage
,
and shrewd and decisive in her remarks,
presented no bad counterpart to her milder sister.
Last but not the least interesting of the cheerful
group which was now assembled around the fireside
of the Rector, was Lucy Blakeney. Her beauty,
unimpaired by her early sorrows and preserved by
the active and healthful discharge of the duties of
benevolence, had now become matured into the
fairest
model of lovely womanhood. It was not that
beauty which may be produced by the exquisite
blending of pure tints on the cheek and brow, by
fair waving tresses and perfect symmetry of outline
it was the beauty of character and intellect, the
beauty that speaks in the eye, informs every gesture
and look, and carries to the heart at once the
conviction
,
that in such an one, we behold a lovely
work of the Creator, blessed by his own hand and
pronounced good.
The Rector was delighted to find the three
orphans once more met under his own roof, and
apparently enjoying the blessings of this world in
such a spirit as gave him no painful apprehensions
concerning the future.
I cannot express to you, he said, how happy
I am to see you all here again once more before my
departure. It has long been the desire of my heart.
It is accomplished, and I can now leave my blessing
with you and depart in peace.
You cannot enjoy the meeting more highly
than we do, I am sure, said Aura, the return
to this spot brings back a thousand tender and
delightful
associations to my mind, and I regard
among the most pleasing circumstances which attend
our meeting, the degree of health and enjoyment
in which we find all our old friends at the Rectory.
But how do all our acquaintances among the
cottagers
?
Is the old serjeant living?
16
He is in excellent health, replied the Rector,
and tells all his old stories with as much animation
as ever.
And your protegs, Lady Mary, the distressed
family which you found out, rejoined Aura.
They are well, and quite a happy industrious
family, answered Lady Mary, with a slight blush.
How goes on the school, Lucy, said Edward,
I regard that as the most effective instrument of
benevolent exertion.
I hope it has effected some good, answered
Lucy. There has been a considerable number
from the school who have proved useful and
respectable
so far; several of the pupils are now married,
and others are giving instruction in different parts of
the country. A circumstance which has afforded us
considerable gratification is, that a pupil, whose
merit has raised her to a high station in life, has
visited us lately, and presented a handsome donation
towards rendering the establishment permanent.
After a short pause in the conversation, Mr.
Matthews expressed a wish that they might have
some intelligence from their absent friends.
I have this day received a letter from America,
said Edward, taking it from his pocket and looking
inquiringly at Lucy.
I think you may venture to read it to us, said
she.
It was from Mrs. Franklin, and informed him
that she had purchased a beautiful seat on the banks
of the Delaware, and was living there in the
enjoyment
of all the happiness, which was to be derived
from the society of her family and the delightful
serenity of nature. One circumstance only had
happened since her departure from England to mar
this enjoyment, the account of which must be given
in her own words.
`My oldest son, your friendno doubt you have
often heard from him. He soon grew tired of the
India service, and was at his own desire exchanged
into a regiment which had been ordered to join the
army in Spain. There, his career was marked with
the heroism and generosity which had ever
distinguished
his character. A young officer is now
visiting
me, who accompanied him in his last campaign.
He informs me, that my noble son never lost an
opportunity
either of signalizing himself in action or
relieving the distresses of those who suffered the
calamities of war.
`In one of the severest battles fought upon the
peninsula, it was the fortune of my son to receive
a severe wound, while gallantly leading his men to
a breach in the walls of a fortified town. The
English
were repulsed, and a French officer, passing
over the field, a few hours after, with a detachment,
had the barbarity to order one of his men to fix his
bayonet in him. His friend, who was also wounded
and lay near him, saw it, but was too helpless
himself
to raise an arm in his defence.
`The same night, the town was taken by storm.
When the English force advanced, the unfortunate
officers were both conveyed to safe quarters, and
my poor son lived thirty-six hours after the capture
of the place. During this time, the story of his
inhuman treatment reached the ears of the
commander
in chief. Fired with indignation, he
hastened
to the quarters of the wounded officers.
`Poor Franklin, says his friend, was lying
in the arms of his faithful servant and breathing
heavily, when the illustrious Wellington entered
the room. It was apparent to all that he had but
a few moments to live.
`Tell me, said the General, exert but strength
enough to describe to me the villain who inflicted
that unmanly outrage upon you, and I swear by the
honour of a soldier that in one hour his life shall
answer it.'
`Never did I see the noble countenance of
Franklin
assume such an expression of calm magnanimity
as when he replied,
`I am not able to designate him, and if I could
do it with certainty, be assured, Sir, that I never
would.'
`These were his last words, and in a few minutes
more his spirit fled to a brighter region.'
If there are sorrows which refuse the balm of
sympathy, there are also consolations which those
around us can neither give nor take away.
Through the remaining years of her life, the orphan
daughter of the unfortunate Charlotte Temple evinced
the power and efficiency of those exalted principles,
which can support the mind under every trial, and
the happiness of those pure emotions and lofty
aspirations
whose objects are raised far above the
variable
contingencies of time and sense.
In the circle of her friends she seldom alluded to
past events; and though no one presumed to invade
the sanctuary of her private griefs and recollections,
yet all admired the serene composure with which
she bore them. Various and comprehensive schemes
of benevolence formed the work of her life, and
religion shed its holy and healing light over all her
paths.
When the summons came, which released her
pure spirit from its earthly tenement, and the
history
of her family was closed with the life of its last
representative; those who had witnessed, in her
mother's fate, the ruin resulting from once yielding
to the seductive influence of passion, acknowledged,
in the events of the daughter's life, that benignant
power which can bring, out of the most bitter and
blighting disappointments, the richest fruits of virtue
and happiness.SIR,
I am sensible you will blame the step
I am about to take, but I cannot be happy unless as
the wife of Sir Stephen Haynes. Before you will
receive this, I shall be considerably advanced on the
road to Scotland, not that, being my own mistress,
any one has a right to control me, but I dreaded
expostulation
,
shuddered at the idea of published banns,
or a formal wedding by license, with settlements,
lawyers, and parchments. These things have, I
believe
,
little to do with love.
But they have a great deal to do with prudence,
I conceive, said the agitated Rector, pausing a
moment
from the perusal of the letter.
Sir Stephen, he at length proceeded, has
promised to settle half his fortune on me, as a
voluntary
act of gratitude after I am his wife, and in
return
for this liberality I have given my little fortune
into his hands. He talks of purchasing a peerage,
and I begin to have different ideas of nobility since
he has convinced me that all by nature are equal,
and that distinctions have been always purchased by
some means or other; and what matter is it whether
by fighting for the rights of the monarch, or by
advancing
money to supply his necessities.
My dear friend Miss Brenton accompanies me
to Scotland, I shall, after a short tour, visit her in
Hampshire, then, having taken a view of Sir
Stephen's
place in Wiltshire, and given our orders for
repairs, new furnishing, &c. we shall make an
excursion
of a few months to the continent. On our
return we shall pay our respects to you in
Hampshire
,
and solicit a visit from any of the inmates of
your mansion who may feel disposed so to honour
us. I beg you to accept my thanks for your care of
my interest and happiness, although we happened
not to think alike upon the latter subject, and make
my acknowledgments to Mrs. Matthews and the
other ladies of the family for their kind attentions.
I am, Sir, with Respect
and Esteem,
MARY LUMLEY.TO MISS THERESA BRENTON,
You cannot be surprised, Theresa, after
the explanation which took place between Lady
Mary and myself yesterday, that I should declare
my utter inability to make those settlements which
I talked of before our excursion to the north. I
must beg you to make my acknowledgments to the
dear generous girl for all marks of favour and
kindness
bestowed by her on her unworthy, humble
servant, but my finances are in such a state, that
it is totally impossible for me to take a journey to
Wilts, as proposed, or to solicit her company to
France, whither I must repair as speedily as possible,
to rusticate; whilst my affairs in England are put in
train to restore me to some comparative degree of
affluence. My friend, Richard Craftly, Esq. has
offered
the cottage to you and your lovely friend as long
as you may please to occupy it. He is, Miss
Brenton
,
a man of good abilities, amiable disposition, and
possessed of a small but genteel and unincumbered
estate, which upon the death of his mother will be
augmented. He will call on you this afternoon, I
recommend him to your notice
. My best wishes
attend you and your fair associate Lady Mary.
I am, Dear Theresa,
Your Obliged friend, &c. &c.
STEPHEN HAYNES.TO MISS LUCY T. BLAKENEY,
To be delivered on the day she attains the age of
21.
From the hour when I closed the eyes of your
beloved, ill fated mother, you, my dear Lucy, have
been the delight and solace of your grandmother and
myself. And your amiable disposition has led us to
hope, that you may in future be the happy inheritress
of the estate and property on which we have lived
above thirty-five years: happy, my child, in
bestowing
11*
comfort on others, and doubly happy in the
enjoyment of reflected joy from grateful hearts.
You are in possession of independence from the
bequest of Captain Blakeney, but you will find by my
will, that it is my wish that not a farthing of that
bequest
,
either principal or interest, should be expended
on you during your minority. The income arising
from your hereditary estate, &c. being amply
sufficient
to clothe, board, and educate you, in the style
of a gentlewoman. You are by law entitled to the
name and arms of Blakeney, but there was a clause
annexed to your godfather's will which gave your
dear grandmother and myself some uneasiness.
It is that which insists that your future husband
should change his own name to that of Blakeney, or
the whole of the original bequest will be forfeited,
and the accumulated interest only be yours.
My lamented wife, in her last hours, Lucy, said
to me, `I wish, love, you may live to see our lovely
child of an age when you may advise her never
to shackle her sensibility by feeling as if she were
obliged to reject the man whom she may love, and
who might make her very happy, because himself
or his friends should object to a change of name. I
myself have such a predilection for family names,
that had it not been for particular circumstances, and
that the name of a female must at some time or other
in all probability be changed, I should never have
consented to our Lucy assuming the name of
Blakeney
.
Should you be called hence before she is of a
proper age to understand and be entrusted with every
necessary communication on the subject of her birth,
and other interesting circumstances, I must intreat
you will be very explicit with her guardians, and
also leave a letter addressed to herself.'
Soon after this conversation, the companion and
friend of my life, the heightener of all my joys, the
consoler of all my sorrows, the only woman I ever
loved, left this transitory sphere for a more blissful
region. From that moment the world, my Lucy, has
appeared a blank. Not even your endearing
cheerfulness
,
your affectionate sympathy, could call me
back to any enjoyment in life, I have endeavoured
several times to nerve my feelings to the
performance
of this task, and have blamed myself for thus
procrastinating it. But from several symptoms of
failure in my mental and bodily vigour, I feel it will
not be long before I follow my regreted partner into
the world of spirits.
I expect to see Mr. Matthews in the course of a
few weeks, I shall then make him the confidant of
many sorrows, which have sunk deep into my heart,
and drank its vital energies, earlier than, perhaps,
time might have impaired them. I intreat, my Lucy,
my last earthly treasure, that in no momentous
concern
of your life you will act without consulting
him, and when you have consulted, abide entirely
by his decision.
As it regards a matrimonial connection, let not
the clause of your godfather's will have any
influence
.
Your own patrimony will yield four hundred
pounds a year; this must half be settled on
yourself
.
The accumulation of the interest on my friend
Blakeney's bequest will be very considerable in
eleven years. This is your own to be settled or
disposed of as yourself may direct. I have, by
insisting on half your patrimony being settled on
yourself previous to the day of marriage, secured to
you the comforts and conveniences of life, as long
as life may be continued; for the rest, I leave you in
the charge of a good and heavenly Protector, who
will never leave those to perish, who rely on his
providence.
There is one thing, my ever dear child, I am very
anxious about, and on which my charge to you will
be very solemn. It is, that you will never marry
any one of the name of M.
Here the stroke of death arrested the hand which
held the pen, and the good old gentleman was found
as already mentioned, dead in his easy chair.
What can I think, how must I act? said Lucy,
as with stunned faculties she still gazed on the open
letter on the table before her. I will determine on
nothing till I know the opinion of my guardian on
the subject: in the mean time I will implore the
guidance and protection of HIM who knoweth best
what is good for his children, and leave the event to
time. So concluding, she folded the letter,
performed
her nightly devotions, and retired to her
bed.TO LIEUTENANT JOHN FRANKLIN.
I have sat down, my dear sir, to fulfil
a most unpleasant task in communicating to you by
the desire of our lovely and esteemed friend, Miss
Blakeney, a copy of her grandfather's letter, which
I inclose, thinking it best to keep the original in my
possession.
You perceive that the old gentleman was by no
means averse to her marrying to please herself though
it might be to the diminution of her fortune. That
there were some unhappy circumstances attending
the birth of Miss Blakeney, I have every reason to
conclude; though, what those circumstances were, I
never could ascertain. For though my respected
old friend frequently promised to impart them to
me, the communication was deferred from time to
time, till with him, poor man, time was no more.
You will perceive that there is some particular
family into which he had strong objections to her
marrying, but the unfinished capital, which I am at
a loss to decide whether meant for an N, and M, or
an A, leads to no direct conclusion. I know he had
a peculiar dislike to a family of the name of Lewis,
the descendants of which in one branch are Mertons,
in another Northalertons. There was a person also
of the name of Allister, who gave him much trouble
by a law suit. But I hardly could think my old
friend was so little of a christian as to let his
prejudice
descend from generation to generation.
However
,
be that as it may, there is nothing in the
unfinished capital, that looks like F. Miss Blakeney
is well, has kept her birth day in a most novel and
splendid manner; I wish you could have seen her
presiding amongst her guests; but I presume it will
not be long before we see you at the Rectory, when
you will hear from every tongueyes, even from
sister Cavendish, her eulogium.
I am, Dear Sir,
Yours, with Esteem,
ALFRED MATTHEWS.